Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 



BIBLIOGRAPHIC RECORD TARGET 

Graduate Library 
University of Michigan 

Preservation Office 

Storage Number: 



ABN2643 

ULFMTBRTaBLmT/C DT 07/18/88 R/DT 07/18/88 CC STATmmE/Ll 

010: : I a 07038569 

035/1: : | a (RLIN)MIUG86-B42066 

035/2: : [a (CaOTULAS)160031819 

040: : |cCtY IdCtY |dMiU 

050/1:0: |aQA501 |b.W59 

100:1 : I a Whitehead, Alfred North, ] d 1861-1947. 

245:04: | a The axioms of descriptive geometry, |cby A.N. Whitehead. 

260; : | a Cambridge, | b University press, |cl907. 

300/1: : javiii, 74p. |bdiagrs. |c22cm. 

440/1: 0: | a Cambridge tracts in mathematics and matiiematical physics. | v no. 5 

650/1:0: I a Geometry, Descriptive 

998: : |cRSH |s9124 



Scanned by Imagenes Digitales 
Nogales, AZ 

On behalf of 

Preservation Division 

The University of Michigan Libraries 



Date work Began: _ 
Camera Operator: . 



Hosted by 



Google 



oamonage i racts in Mathematics 
and Mathematical Physics 

General Editors 

J. G. LEATHEM, M.A. 

E. T. WHITTAKER, M.A„ F.R.S. 



No. 5 

THE AXIOMS OF 
DESCRIPTIVE GEOMETRY 

by 
A. N. WHITEHEAD, Sc.D., F.R.S. 



Cambridge University Press Warehouse 

C. F. Clay, Manager 

London : Fetter Lane^ E.C, 

Glasgow: jo, Wellington Street 

1907 

Price 2S. 6d. net 



Hosted by 



Google 



Cambridge Tracts in Mathematics 
and Mathematical Physics 

General Editors 

J. G. LEATHEM, M.A. 

E. T. WHITTAKER, M.A., F.R.S. 



No. 5 
The Axioms of Descriptive Geometry. 



Hosted by 



Google 



CAMBRIDGE UNIVERSITY PRESS WAREHOUSE, 

C. F. CLAY, Manager. 

EonDon: FETTEE LANE, E.G. 

Blatgotoi 60, WELLINGTON STREiiT. 



l.ii;ijiB; F. i. BROCKHADS. 
(ftfto gorh: O. P. PUTUAM'S SONS. 
Utrnlma anC UbIibUb: MACM1I,1j\N AND CO., " 



Hosted by 



Google 



THE AXIOMS OF 
DESCRIPTIVE GEOMETRY 



by 
A. N. WHITEHEAD, Sc.D., F.R.S. 

Fellow of Trinity College. 



Cambridge; 

at the University Press 

1907 



Hosted by 



Google 



Hosted by 



Google 



PREFACE. 

THIS tract is written in connection with the previous tract, No. 4 of 
this series, on Projective Geometry, and with the same general 
aims. In that tract, after the statement of the axioms, the ideas 
considered were those concerning harmonic ranges, projectivity, order, 
the introduction of coordinates, and cross-ratio. In the present tract, 
after the statement of the axioms, the ideas considered are those 
concerning the association of Projective and Descriptive Geometry by 
means of ideal points, point to point correspondence, congruence, 
distance, and metrical geometry. It has been my object in both 
tracts to extend tlie investigations just far enough to assure the reader 
that the whole of Geometry is really secured by the axioms statfid. 
My hopes for a comparative freedom from typographical errors are 
based upon my experience of the excellence of the University Press. 



A. N. W. 



Cambbidob. 

March, 1907. 



Hosted by 



Google 



CONTENTS. 



ChAI'TER I. FORMULATIO^JS OF THE AsiOMS. 

Sect. 1. The Introduction of Order 1 

2. Undefined Ideas 2 

3. Pcano's Asioms 3 

4. Definition of a Plane 4 

5. Axioms of a Plane 4 

S. Axioms of Three Dimensions o 

7. Vajioiis Definitions 6 

8. Veblen's Axioms ........ 7 

9. Dedekind'8 Axiom 9 

10. The Euclidean Axiom 10 

Chapter II. The Associated Projective Space. 

Sect. 11. Convex Regions 12 

12. Convex Regions as Descriptive Spaces ... 13 

13. Existence Theorems 14 

14. Further Existence Theorems 14 

15. Advantages of Ideal Points 15 

16. A Lemma 15 

17. Desaigues' Perspective Theorems .... 16 

18. Trihedrons 17 

19. Theorem on Sheaves of Planes 18 

20. Theorem on Coplauarity of Lines .... 19 

Chapter III. Ideal Points. 

Sect 21. Definitions of Ideal Elements 22 

22. A Property of Ideal Points 23 

23. A Property of Ideal Lines 23 

24. Idea! Points and Lines 26 



Hosted by 



Google 



AaiomB of Projective Geometry 27 

Theoreme on Ideal Elements 27 

Aiioms of the Projective Piano 29 

Harmonic Ranges 30 

Order of Ideal Points ... .31 

The Dedekind Property . . .32 



Chapter IV. General Theory or CoHREsroNDENCE. 

Sect. 31. Definition of a Relation 

32. The Transformation of Coordinates . 

33. One-one Point Correspondences . 

34. Finite Continuous Groups . 

35. Infinitesimal Transformations 

36. The Second Fundamental Theorem . 

37. Latent Elements 

38. The Correspondence of Neighhourhoods 

39. The General Projective Group . 

40. Infinitesimal Projective Transform ations 



Chapter V. Axioms oe Congruence 
Sect. 41. Congruen e as F ndw 

42. Lie a Pr loedure 

43. Lies Frst h lut o 

44. Lies 'seco d Sol t 

45. A Th rd Pehn t on f C 



Chapter VI. Infinitesimal R tati f 



4fi. 


Ti e U que es. f fi 1 1 s 










47. 


Latent PUnes thr gh the \ 


s 








48. 


M >dr y 










49. 


The Late cy of Po ta on Ai 


s 








50. 


Late t Pla ee 










51. 


Latent Plat es { o i ed) 










S2, 


The Axes of E tat o 










53. 


The Axes of Rotat ons ( o ( 


«-/) 








fi4. 


Rectang lar Axes 










.'iS. 


The Axes f Rotat o ( o 


«') 








fifi. 


The Con Latent Pla e 










57. 


The \xes of Rotat ons { 


ed) 









58. Ge e al Fo -m f r Infan te mal Rotat ons round Origin 



Hosted by 



Google 



Chapter VII. The Absolute. 

Sect. 69. Surfeees of Revolution 61 

60. Spheres 61 

61. Quadrics of Revolution 6^ 

62. Families of Concentric Spheres 63 

63. The Absolute Sphere 64 

64. The Absolute 65 

65. The Absolute {continued] 65 

66. The Three Types of Congruence Groups ... 67 

67. Paj-abolic Groups 6" 

Chaptbe VIII, Metrical Gbometky. 

Sect. 68. Definition of Distance 69 

69. Analytical Espresaion for Distance in Elliptic Groups . 70 

70. Analytical Expression for Distance in Hyjierbolie 

Groups 70 

71. Analytical Expression for Distance in Paralxilio Groups 71 

72. Angles between Planes 71 

73. Angles between Lines 72 

74. Metrical Geometry and Congruence Groups 73 

75. Special Metrical Aiionis 73 



Hosted by 



Google 



CHAPTER I. 

FORMULATIONS OF THE AXIOMS. 

The general considerations which must govern a mathematical 
1 on the foundations of Geometry have been explained in 
Chapter I of the previous tract of this series, on the Axioms of 
Projective Geometry*, It is explained there that 'Descriptive 
Geometry' is here used as a generic term for any Geometry in which 
two straight lines in a plane do not necessarily intersect. Also it is 
pointed out that the purely classificatory portions of a Descriptive 
Geometry are clumsy and uninteresting, and that accordingly the idea 
of order is introduced from the very beginning. 

There are three main ways by which this introduction of order 
can be conveniently managed. In one way, which is represented by 
Peano's axioms given below (^ 3—6), the class of points whieli lie 
between any two points is taken as a fundamental idea. It is then 
easy to define the class of points collinear with the two points and 
lying beyond one of them. Thus these three classes of points, namely 
the two classes lying beyond the two points respectively and the class 
lying between the two points, together with the two points themselves 
form the straight line defined by the two points. Then a set of axioms 
of the straight line are required, concerned with the idea of ' between,' 
and also axioms are required respecting coplanar lines. 

Another way, which was pointed out by Vailatif and RussellJ, is 
to conceive a straight line as essentially a serial relation involving two 
terras. The whole field of such a rektion, namely the terms which are 
thus ranged in order by it, forms the class of points on the straight 
line. Thus the Geometry starts with the fundamental conception of a 

* In the sequel this tract will be referred to fta ' Proj. Geoul.' 
+ Cf. Rivista di Matematica, vol. iv. 
t Cf, Pnnciples 0/ Mathematice. g 376, 



Hosted by 



Google 



2 THE INTRODUCTION OF ORDER [CH. I 

class of relations. The axioms of the straight line are the axioms 
which secure that each of these relations is a serial relation. The 
points are the entities occurring in the fields of any of these relations. 
The axioms of the plane are the same as in the previous mode of 
development. 

Tlie third way, recently developed by Prof. 0. Veblen*, is to 
consider the science of Descriptive Geometry as the study of the 
properties of one 'iiii^le three termed relation of order. The entities 
forming the field of thi^ relation aie the points. When this relation 
holds between three pumts A, B, and C it is said that 'the points 
A, B, and G, are m the linear order A BC ' This method of conceiving 
tlie subject results m a notable simphfacation, and combines advantages 
from the two previous metliod'^ Veblen & axioms will be stated in full 
(of. I S). 

2. The enunciation ot the axioma ot Descriptive Geometry, wliich 
is given in the sections (§§ 3 — 6) immediately following, is that due to 
Peanot. His formulation is based upon that of Pasch J, to whom is due 
the first satisfactory systematic exposition of the subject, The unde- 
fined fundamental ideas are two in number, namely that of a class of 
entities called ' points,' and that of the ' class of points Ipng between 
any two given points.' It has already been explained^ that this 
undetermined class of points is in fact any class of entities with inter- 
relations, such that the axioms are satisfied when considered as referring 
to them. 

The symbol AB will represent the class of points lying between 
the points A and B. This class will be called the segment AB. 

The first group of axioms, eleven in number, secure the ordinary 
properties of a straight line with respect to the order of points on it, 
and also with respect to the division of a lineil into three parts by any 

* Cf. A •System of iiwmsfor Geometry Trana of the Amer Math Soe., vol. t., 
190*. 

+ Ct. I pnjicjpn d% Oeometria, Tann, 1889 These axiima are repeated by 
hira in an article Sui fondamenU della ireomftria, Riiiata di Matpraatica, vol. iv. 
1894. In this latter article the minute mathematical dednctions are omitted, and 
their place is "taken by valuable obEJecvation? on the main pniuti tr be oonfiiiiered. 
Alao a treatment of conRcuenee la Riven which does not appear in the earlier 
tract. This article should be studied oarefully bv even student of the subject. 

I Of. VortesuTigen uber neuere Geometrie, Leipzig lHhi Thib treatise is the 
olassio work on the subject 

§ Cf. Pro]. GeoTi!. § 2. 

II Note that 'line' will be habitually used for 'straight line.' 



Hosted by 



Google 



1-3] PEANOS AXIOMS 6 

two points on it, and into two parts by any siuglo point on it. The 
Dedekind property* is not secured by them, but, compactness f is 
secured by axiom IV. 

3, Peano's axioms of the straight line are as follows : 

I. There is at least one point. 

II. If ^ is any point, there is a point distinct from A. 

III. If -4 is a point, there is no point lying between A and A. 
It follows that the class AA possesses no members. 

IV. If A and B are distinct points, there is at least one point 
lying between A and B. 

Thus the class AB is not the null class. 

V. If the point C lies between A and B, it also lies between 
B and A. 

It easily follows that the classes AB and BA are identical 

VI. The point A does not lie between the points A and Jl. 
Thus the class, or segment, AB does not include its end-point« 

A and 5. 

Definition. If A and B are points, the symbol A'B represents the 
class of points, such as C, with tte property that B lies between 
A and C. Thus A'B is the prolongation of the line beyond £, and 
BA is its prolongation beyond A. 

VII. If A and B are distinct pomts, there exists at least one 
member of A'B. 

VIII. If ^ and J) are distinct points, and Cis a member o( AD, 
and 5 of Jl C, then 5 is a member of A D. 

IX. If .4 and i? are distinct points, and B and Care members of 
AD, then either B is a member of AC, or B is identical with C, or B 
is a member of CD. 

X. If A and B are distinct points, and C and D are members of 
A'B, then either C is identical with D, or C is a member of BD, or D 
is a member of BG. 

XI. if A, B, C, D are points, and 5 is a member oi AC, and G 
of BD, then C is a member of A D. 

D^nitim. The straight line possessing A and B, symbolized by 
str (A, B), is composed of the three classes A'B, AB, BA. together 
with the points A and B themselves. 

Then by the aid of the previous axioms the usual theorems, 

* Cf. Proj. Geom. § 19, and g 9 of the present tract, 
t Cf. Proj. Geoin. § 16, 



Hosted by 



Google 



4 DEFINITION OF A PLANE [CH, 1 

excluding the Dedekind property, respecting the order of points on a 
line can be proved. Also any two points are both contained by one 
and only one line. 

4. Peano uses the following useful notation which is an extension 
of his notation for segments and prolongations. If .-4 is a point and 
M is a class of points, then Au is the class of points lying on the 
segments between A and points of u, and A'u is the class of point* on 
the prolongations of these segments beyond the points of u. 

Then in conformity with this notation the seven regions into which 
a plane is divided by three lines are as in the figure. 




The plane determined by the three non-collinear points A, B, C — 
written pie {A, B, C) — is defined to be the class of points consisting of 
the points on tihe three lines str {BG), str {CA), and str (AB), and 
of the points in the seven regions A (BC), A' (B&j. B' (CA), C (AB). 
A- (B-O), B (_C'A), O'(A-B). 

5. Three axioms are re(iuired to establish the Geometry of 
a plane. 

XII. If r is a straight line, there exists a point which does not 
lie on r. 

Note that it would be sufficient to enunciate this axiom for one 
straight line. 

XIII. If A, B, C are three non-coUinear points, and B lies on 
the segment BC, and E on the segment AB, there exists a point F 
on both the segment A(7and the prolongation B'E((s(. fig. i, p. 5). 

XIV. If A, B, C are three non-coUinear points, and B lies on the 



Hosted by 



Google 



3-6] AXIOMS OF A PLANE 5 

segment BC, and F on the segment AG, there exists a point E lying 
on both the segments AD and BF{ci. fig. ii). 




With tliese axioms all the usual properties of the division of a 
plane by a line, and of the inside and outside of a plane closed figure, 




Fig. ii. 
can he proved. Thus if ABC form a triangle and a coplanar line 
intersect the segment BG, it must intersect one and only one of the 
segments GA and AB. 

Also any three uon-coUinear points lie in one and only one plane ; 
and the line determined by any two points lying in a plane lies entirely 
in that plane. But, as the case of Euclidean Geometry shews, we 
caimot prove from these axioms that any two lines in a plane 
intersect. 

6. For three-dimensional Geometry two otlier axioms are required. 
XV. A point can be found external to any plane. The enuncia- 
tion of this axiom can be restricted bo a particular plane. 



Hosted by 



Google 



6 AXIOMS OF THREE DIMENSIONS [cH. I 

XVI. Given any plane p, and. any point A outside it, and any 
point Q on it, and any point fi on the prolongation A'% then, \i X\.% 
any other point, either X lies on the plane p, or AX intersects the 
plane p, or JiX intersecta the plane p. 

The annexed figure illustrates the ajdom, the points ^i, X^, X^ 
being positions of X which illustrate the three alternatives contem- 
plated in tlie axiom. Thus X, lies on the plane p ; X^ lies on the 




same side of p as B, so that AX.^ must cut p in some point L ; X^ 
lies on the same side of y as .4, so that BX% must cut p in some 
point M. 

Axiom XVI secures the limitation to three dimensions, and the 
division of spa«o by a plane. It can also be proved from the axioms 
that, if two planes intersect in at least one point, they intersect in 
a straight line. 

7. A point will be said to divide a line into two half-rays which 
emanate from it. 

A line will be said to divide a plane into two half-planes which 
are bounded by it. 

A plane will be said to divide space into two half-spaces which are 
bounded by it. 



Hosted by 



Google 



b-Bj VARIOUS DEFINITIONS 7 

A aheaf of lines is a complete set of eoplanar lines coneMrreiit 
at one point (the vertex). A sheaf of half-rays is a complete set of 
eoplanar half-rays emanating from one point (the vertes), 

A bundle of lines is a complete set of lines concurrent at one point 
(the vertex). A bundle of half-rays is a complete set of haif-rays 
emanating from one point (the vertex). 

If p, q, r are three half-rays belonging to a sheaf of half-rays, then 
r is said to ' lie between ' p and q, if points A and B can be found on 
p and q respectively, such that the segment AB intersects r. 

It can be proved that if ;■ lies between p and q, then p does not 
lie between r and q. 

The complete set of planes through a given line (the axis) is called 
a sheaf of planes. The axis divides ea^^h plane into two haJf-planes. 
These half-planes form a sheaf of half-planes. 

If p, q, r are three half-planes belonging to a sheaf of half-planes, 
then r is said to ' lie between ' p and q, if points A and B can be found 
on p and q respectively, such that the segment AB intersects )■. 

It can be proved that if r lies between p and q, then p does not lie 
between r and q. 

The theorems indicated in this and in the preceding sections, and 
allied theorems, are not always very easy to prove. But their proofs 
depend so largely upon the particular mode of formulation of the 
asioms, that it would be outside the scope of this tract to enter into 
a consideration of them. In the sequel we shall assume that the whole 
class of theorems of the types, which have been thus generally indi- 
cated, can be proved from the axioms stated. 

8, Formulations ot the axioms of Descriptive Geometry have also 
been given by Hilhert*, and by E. H. Moore t, and by B. Russell J, 
and by Veblen^ Veblen's memoir represents the final outcome of 
these successive labour=i, and his formulation will be given now. The 
axioms aie itated m term^ of ' points ' and of a relation among three 
points called ' order ' Points and order are not defined. 

1 There exist at least two distinct points. 

* Grundlaqen d'r Geometiie, Leipzig, 1899, Engliali Translation by E. J. 
Townsend, Chicago, 1902 

+ On the Prct/tctite ■liioma of Geometry, Trans, of the Amer. Math. Sou., 

TOI UL, I'Wi 

J The Fnnciplf of Mathematici, Cambridge, 1903, ch. SLvr. 

@ A System of Axlonu for Geometry, Trans, of the Amer. Math. Soo., vol. v., 
1904. 



Hosted by 



Google 



8 veblen's axioms [ch. I 

II. If the points A, B, Care in the order ABC, they are in the 
order CBA. 

III. If tlie points A, B, C are m the order ABC, they are not 
in the order BCA. 

IV. If the points A, B, C are in the order ABC, then A is 
distinct from C. 

V. If A and B are any two distinct points, there exists a point C 
such that A, B, are in the order ABC. 

Definition 1. The hne AB {A^B) consists of A and B, and of 
aU points X in one of the possible orders ABX, AXB, XAB. The 
points X in the order AXB constitute the 'segment' AB. A and 
B are the 'end-points' of the segment, but are not included in it. 

VI. If points Cand D {C^D) lie on the line AB, then A lies on 
the line CD. 

VII. If there exist three distinct points, there exiat three points 
A, B, C not in any of the orders A BC, BCA, or CAB. 

Definition 2, Three distinct points not lying on the same line are 
the 'vertices' of a 'triangle' ABC, whose sides are the segments AB, 
BC, GA, and whose 'boundary' consists of its vertices and the points 
of its sides. 

VIII. If three distinct points A, B, C do not tie on the same line, 
and D and E are two points in the orders BCD and CEA, then a 




point F exists in the order AFB and such that D, E, F lie on the 
same line. 

Definition 5, A point is ' in the interior of a triangle, if it lies 
on a segment, the end-points of which are points of different sides of a 
triangle. The aet of such points is ' the interior ' of the triangle. 

Definition 6. If A, B, C form a triangle, the 'plane' ABC 
consists of all points collineai with any two pomta of the aides of the 
triangle. 



Hosted by 



Google 



8, 9J DEDEKIND S AXIOM 9 

IX. If tliere exist tliree points not lying in the saine line, there 
exists a plane ABG such that there is a point D not lying in the 
plane ABG. 

Definitim 7. If ^, B, G, and D are fonr points not lying in the 
same plane, they form a 'tetrahedron ' ABCD, whose 'faces' are the 
interiors of the triangles ABC, BCD, GDA, DAB, whose 'vertices' 
are the four points A, B, 0, and D, and whose 'edges' are the 
segments AB, BG, GB, DA, AG, BD. The point* of faees, edges, 
and vertices constitute the 'surface' of the tetrahedron. 

Definition 8. If A, B, C, D are the vertices of a tetrahedron, the 
space ABGD consists of all points collinear with any two points of the 
faces of the tetrahedron. 

X. If there exist four points, neither lying in the same line, nor 
lying in the same plane, there exists a space ABCD, such that there is 
no point E not collinear with two points of the space A BCD. 

The above axioms of Veblen are equivalent to the axioms of Peano 
which have been previously given. Both Peano and Veblen give an 
axiom securing the Dedekind property (cf. g 9). Also Veblen gives an 
axiom secunng the 'Euclidean' property (cf. g 10). 

9. Dodekind'a original formulation* of his famous property applies 
directly to the case of a descriptive line and is as follows ; 

" If all points of the straight line fall into two classes such that 
every point of the first class lies to the left of every point of the second 
class, then there exists one and only one point which produces this 
division of all points into two classes, this severing of the straight line 
into two portions." 

It is of course to be understood that the dividing point itself 
belongs to one of the two classes. 

It follows immediately that the boundary of a triangle consists of 
points in a compact closed order possessing the Dedekind property as 
already formulated for closed seriest. 

This definition may be repeated here to exhibit its essential in- 
dependence of the special definition of projective segments upon which 
the previous formulation rests. 

Let A, B, C \>^ any three points of a closed series. Then by 

■ Cf. hia Continuity and iTratiimal Numbers, ch. ii(. ; the quotation here ia 
from Beman'B translation, Chicago, 1901. 
+ Cf. Proj. Geom.§19(a). 



Hosted by 



Google 



10 dedekind's axiom [ch. I 

liypothesis the series is such that there are two ways round from A 
to C, uamely, one through B and one not through B. Let segm (ABC) 




denote the points, excluding A and C, which are traversed from 
A to C through B, and let segm (ABC) denote the remaining 
points of the series. Again let a class u of the points of the series 
be called a segment of the series, when (1) there is a point B of the 
series which does not belong to «, and (2) if F and Q be any two 
points of M then segm (PBQ) belongs entirely to u. 

Then the series possesses the Dedekind property if any segment 
such as M (which excludes more than one point of the series) must 
possess two boundary points, that is to say, if there must exist points 
A and C such that segm (ABC), with the possible exception of either 
or both of A and C, is identical with ii. Here— as above — B is a 
point which does not belong to u. 

Hence a sheaf of half-rays can also be considered as a closed 
■ compact series with the Dedekind property. This is made immediately 
evident by surrounding the vertex by a triangle in the plane of the 
sheaf. Then each half-ray of the sheaf intersects the boundary of the 
triangle in one and only one point. Also the order of the points on 
the boundary is the order of the corresponding half-rays of the sheaf 
But the boundary of the triangle is a closed series with the Dedekind 
property. 

10. By the aid of the Dedekind axiom and of the preceding 
axioms, it can now be proved that, if I be any line and A be any point, 
not incident in I, then in the plane Al at least one line can be drawn 
through A, which does not intersect l. 



Hosted by 



Google 



9, 101 THE EUCLIDEAN AXIOM 11 

For take any point B on I, aod \etp and q he the two supplementary 
half-rays of I which emanate from B. Consider the sheaf of half-rays, 



vertex A, in the plane Al. Some of these half-rays intersect p and 
some intersect q, and these classes are mutually exclusive. 

Also, from the Dedekind property, there exist two semi-rays which 
are limits of the semi-rays intersecting p. AB is one of the semi-rays, 
let r be the other. Now the semi-ray^ has no end-point. Hence r is 
not among the semi-rays intersecting p. Again by similar reasoning 
there is a semi-ray s wldeh is the limit of the semi-rays inter- 
secting q, and s does not intersect q. 

Now first let r and s be not eoUinear, and let r' and s' be the 
half-rays supplementary to r and s respectively. Consider the set 
(a, say) of lines through A with one set of their half-rays between 
r and a', and therefore with their supplementary half-rays between 
/ and s. There are an infinite number of such lines. Now all half- 
rays emanating from A and lying between the half-ray AB and r 
intersect p, and no other half-rays from A intersect^. Similarly for 
the half-rays AB and s and q. Also if s' lie between the half-ray AB 
and r, then r lies between the half-ray AB and s ; and in this case 
every line of the set a intersects the line I twice, namely once for each 
of its pair of supplementary half-rays emanating from A. But this is 
impossible. Hence neither the supplement of r nor that of s can 
intersect I. Secondly if r and s are collinear, then the complete line 
formed by r and s cannot intersect I. For neither r nor s intersects I. 

Thus taking any point A and any line /, the sheaf of lines, 
vertex A and in the plane Al, falls into two parta, namely the lines 
which intersect /, called the lines ' secant ' to I, and the lines which do 
not intersect /, called the lines 'non-secant ' to I. The non-secant lines 
of the sheaf may reduce to one line. The supposition that this is the 
case is the ' Euclidean Axiom,' 



Hosted by 



Google 



to an t 



CHAPTER II. 

THE ASSOCIATED PROJECTIVE SPACE. 

^ We have now to establish the relation of Descriptive Geometry 
1 associated Projective Geometry. In a Projective Space let a 
' convex region ' be defined to be a region which (1) does not include 
the whole of any line, and (2) includes the whole of one of the two 
segments between any two points within it. It is easy to prove that 
such regions exist. For remembering* that we can employ the 
ordinary theory of homogeneous coordinates, the surface 

is well known to enclose such a region. Let a quadric enclosing a 
convex region be called a ' convex quadric' Again in two dimensions 
let A, B, C be any three non-coUineai points, and let P be any point 
not coUinear with any two of them. Let AP meet the line BC in L, 
BP meet CA in M, CP meet AB m N. 




Define the triangular region {ABCjP) to he the set of points 
formed by the collection of segments such as segm(.4Q^)+, where 
Q is any point on segm (BPM), and B is the point where the line 



" Cf. Pro], Geom. §g 37 and 42. 
+ Cf. Pcoj. Geom. § 13. 



Hosted by 



Google 



11,12] CONVEX REGIONS 13 

AQ iDtersects BC. The points A, B, G can be interchanged in this 
definition without altering the region obtained. 

Similarly in three dimensions, if A, B, C, D are the vertices of a 
non-degenerate tetrahedron, and P be any point not on any of the 
planes, ABC, BCD, etc., the ' t«trahedral region ' {ABCDjP) can be 
similarly defined. From the ordinary theory of homogeneous coordinates, 
it is well known that a triangular region in two dimensions, and a 
tetrahedral region in three dimensions', are both convex regions. 

Again the triangular region (ASC/P) considered above has as its 
'boundary' the segments (BLC), (CMA), (ANB), together with the 
points A, B, C. Also considering the tetrahedral region (ABCDjP), 
let AP intersect BCD in L, BP intersect CDA in M, CP intersect 
DAB in N, DP intersect ABC in 0. Then the ' boundary ' of the 
tetrahedral region {ABCDjP) consists of the triangular regions 
{BGDjL\ {CDAjM), (DABjN), (ABCjO), together with the 
boundaries of these triangular regions. 

It IS now a well-known result from the u-,e of coordinates that m 
two dimensions any line through a point m a triangular region cuth 
the boundary m two points onlj , and that m three dimension'- any 
line through a point in a tetrahedral region cuts the boundaij in two 
points only 

12. Now consider a convex region, let it be either the region 
within a convex quadric, or a tetrahedral region. Call the points 
within it ' Descriptive points' ; and call the portions of lines within it 
' Descriptive lines.' The projective order of points on a line becomes 
an open order for Descriptive points on Descriptive lines. Then by 
the use of coordinate Geometry it is easy to prove that all the 
Descriptive axioms of the present tnwit, either in Peano's form or in 



Vehlen's form, are satisfied, including the Dedekind axiom, but exclud- 
ing the Euclidean axiom. Thus in the figure the lines AB and CD 



Hosted by 



Google 



14 EXISTENCE THEOREMS [CH. II 

intersect at a point ^in Descriptive Space ; but the lines AB and EF 
do not intersect in Descriptive Space, since K lies outside it. Also it 
is evident that through any point P an infinite number of lines can be 
drawn, coplanar with AB, and not intersecting it in Descriptive Space. 

13. The previous article (§ 13) proves* the existence theorem for 
Descriptive Space with the negation of the Euclidean axiom ; in other 
words, it proves the independence of the Euclidean axiom. 

The existence theorem for Descriptive Space with the Euclidean 
axiom is immediately proved by considering the region of Projective 
Space found by excluding all the points on one projective plane. The 
region is convex according to tlie above definition ; also all the 
Descriptive axioms, together with the Dedekind axiom and the Euclidean 
axiom, hold for itf. 

14. The independence of the Dedekind axiom of the other axioms, 
combined with the negation of the Euclidean axiom, is proved by con- 
sidering, as in g 12, Descriptive Space to be a tetrahedral region in 
Projective Space, but confining ourselves to the points whose co- 
ordinates are algebraic numbersj, as in the corresponding proof for 
Projective Geometry. 

The independence of the Dedekind axiom of the other axioms, 
combined with the Euclidean ajtiom, is similarly proved by considering 
Descriptive Space to be the region in Projective Space found by 

* Cf. Proj. Geom. g 43. 

+ In the later Greek period, and daring the seventeenth and eighteenth centuriea, 
the diBoussion of the foundations of Geometry was alraoBt entirely oonSned to 
attempts to prove the Euclidean axiom. The explicit recognitions of its inde- 
pendence by Lobatsehefskij |1828), and by J. Bolyai (1832) laid the foandation of 
the eiisting theories of aon-Buclidean Geometry. For the literature of the whole 
question cf. Staokel and Engel, Die Thmrie der ParallcUinieH von Euklid bii auf 
Gausi, Leipzig, 1895, and also their Urkunden zvr Gesehichte der NiehteukUd- 
ischen Geometrie, I. Labatsche/skij, Leipzig, 1898. 

+ Cf Proj Geom g 43 (o) An oversight in this proof may be here corrected. 
The proof as printed pr ceeds by considenngonlypointawithrational coordinates. 
But then a difhcnlty arises as to the theory of Beftments given in Chapter IV. of 
Pro] Geom For it is necessary that the real double points of a hvperbolio 
n^oliton hhoild lelong to the po nts oousiiered But these double points are 
given bj a quadratic eination Thus algebraic numbers (i e. numbers which can 
occur as tl e roots of equations with integral coefflcientel should be substituted for 
rational numbers. The proof proceeds without other alteration. 1 am indebted to 
Mr G. G. Berry of the Bodleian Library for this c< 



Hosted by 



Google 



12-16] ADVANTAGES OF IDEAL POINTS 15 

excluding a particular plane ; and further, as before, we confine out 
consideration to the points whose coordinates are algebraic numbers. 

15. It has been proved in ^ 12 and 13 that a convex region of a 
Projective Space is a Descriptive Space. The converse problem has 
now to be considered in this and in the next chapter ; namely, given 
a Descriptive Space, to construct a Projective Space of which the 
Descriptive Space is part. This effects a very considerable simplifica- 
tion in the investigation of the properties of Descriptive Space owing 
to the superior generality of the analogous properties of Projective 
Space. Thus a Projective Space affords a complete interpretation of 
all the entities indicated in coordinate geometry. It is in order to 
gain this simplification that the 'plane at iufinity' is introduced into 
ordinary Euclidean Geometry. We have in effect to seek the logical 
justification for this procedure by indicating the exact nature of the 
entities which are vaguely defined as the ' points at infinity ' ; and the 
procedure is extended by shewing that it is not necessarily connected 
with the assumption of the Euclidean axiom. This investigation is 
the Theory of Ideal Points*, or of the generation of 'Proper and 
Improper Projective Points ' in Descriptive Geometry. The Euclidean 
axiom will not be assumed except when it is explicitly introduced. 
The remainder of this chapter will be occupied with the general 
theorems which are required for the investigation. 

16. If A be any point and I be any line not containing A, then 
the plane Al divides the bundle of half-rays emanating from A into 
three seta, (1) the half-rays in the plane Al, (2) the half-rays on one 
side of the pkne, (3) the half-rays on the other side of the plane. 
The sets (2) and (3) are formed of half-rays supplementary one to 
the other. 

Lemma. With the above notation, it is possible to find a plane 
through the line / and intersecting any finite number of the half-rays 
either of set (2) or of set (.8). 

For let a^, ... a^ be n half-rays of one of the two sets. Let B^ be 
any point on a^, and B-i be any point on a^. Then either the plane 

* Originally Buggested bj Klein (extending an eailier suggestion of von Staadt), 
Math. Annal. voU. ly. and vi., 1871 and 1872 ; first worked out in detail bj Pasoh, 
loc. ctt., ^ 6 — 9. In the test I have followed veiy closely a eimplification of the 
argument given by E. Bonola, Sulla Introduzione dtgli Enli Iraprofrii in OeotaeiTia 
Frojectiva, Gioiuale di Matematicic, vol. issviii,, 1900. 



Hosted by 



Google 



16 BESARGUES' PERSrECTIVE THEOREMS [CH. II 

Bil lies between the planes B^l and Al, or the plane B-il lies between 
the planes fii^and Al, or the planes BJ and B-J are identical. But 
in either of the first two cases the intermediate plane intersects both 
semi-rays «i and a^. Hence a plane is found through I, intersecting 
both «! and a^. Call it the plane B-il. Again take any point B, on «3; 
and tlie same argument shews that at least one of Bil and BJ inter- 
sects Oi, (75, and Oa- Proceeding in this way, a plane is finally found 
which intersects each of the n semi-rays. 

17. Desargues' Perspective theorems* can be enunciated in the 
following modified forms : 

(1) If two coplanar triangles ABC and A'BC are such that the 
linas AA', BB CC are concurrent in ^ point 0, then the three inter- 




sections of BC and B'C\ CA aiid G'A', AB and A'B', if they exist, are 
eollinear. 

' Cf. Ptoj. Geom. g 7. 



Hosted by 



Google 



16-18] TRIHEDRONS 17 

(2) If the pairs of homologous sides of the two eoplanar triangles 
ABC and A'EC, namely, BG and B'C, CA and C'A', AB and A'E, 
intersect in three collinear points, then the lines A A', BR, GO', if any 
two intersect, are concurrent in the same point. 

Considering the first proposition let AB and A'ff intersect in L, 
BGxaA BG' in M, CA and C'A' in N. Now it is not possible both 
for A' to lie on the segment OA, and for A to lie on the segment OA'. 
Assume that A! does not lie on the segment OA. Let B be any point 
external to the given plane (a, say). Now by the lemma of § 16, it is 
possible to find a piano through LM, lying between the planes LMB. and 
LMA (i.e. the plane a), and intersecting the three lines BA, MB, BO, 
say, in the points A", B", C" (in the figure C" is not shewn). Then 
evidently A" must lie in the segment BA. Hence A'A", since A' 
does not lie in the segment 0^4, must intersect OB in the segment OB. 
Thus the intersection of the lines A'A" and OR is secured. Let it 
be the point 0'. Again the lines O'A' and OB' are the projections 
from B on the plane A'ffB of the lines OA' and OB. Now A"B' 
passes through L. Hence B" lies on the plane A'A"B, i.e. on the 
plane OA'B. Hence B" is on the projection of the line OB' on the 
plane OA'B', i.e. B" lies on O'B'. Thus B'B" passes through 0'. 

Reasoning in exactly the same way for BG and BC, it follows that 
CO" passes through 0'. The same figure has now been constructed as 
in the proof of the corresponding theorem for Projective Geometry*. 
Accordingly the theorem follows by the same rea.soning. 

In order to demonstrate the converse theorem, we proceed exactly 
as above, except that, L, M, A'" are now assumed to be collinear, is 
the point of intersection of AA' and BB. Then the same construc- 
tion is made as before, and it is successively proved by similar reasoning 
that every pair of the lines A'A", BB", C'C" intersect. But the lines 
are not eoplanar. Hence they intersect in the same point 0'. But ff 
must lie on RO. Thus CO' passes through 0. 

CaroUaty. The enunciation of the first theorem can be modified 
by removing the assumption that ^(? and ,4 'C intersect, but by adding 
the assumption that A intersects iM 

18. A trihedron is the figure formed by three lines concurrent 
in the same point, and not all eoplanar. The three lines form the 
edges of the trihedron ; the three planes containing the lines, two by 
• Cf. Proj. Geom. § 7- 



Hosted by 



Google 



18 SHEAVES OF PLANES [CH. II 

two, foiin the faces of the trihedron ; the point of concurrence of the 
three edges is the yertex of the trihedron. 

It follows (cf. § 6) tliat, if two trihedrons have the same vertex, any 
two faces, one irom each trihedron, must intersect in a line through 
the vertex ; also that any two planes each containing two edges, one 
edge from each trihedron, must intersect in a line through the vertex, 

Desargues' theorems can be applied to two trihedrons with the 
same vertex ; only in this case, as in Projective Geometry, there are 
no exceptional cases depending on non-intersection. 

The enunciations are as follows : 

(1) If a, b, c and a', V, c' are the edges of two trihedrons with the 
same vertex, such that the planes containing a and «', h and h', e and c', 
are concurrent in a line s (i.e. belong to the same she£if), then the three 
intersections of the planes be and b'c', ea and c'a', ah and a'b' are 
coplanai-. 

(2) If a, b, c and a', b\ c are the edges of two trihedrons witli the 
same vertex, such that the three intersections of the planes be and 
b'c', ca and c'a', at> and a'b', are coplanar, then the three planes 
containing a and a', b and b', c and c' belong to the same sheaf. 

These propositions immediately follow from the case of triangles 
by noticing that, by the lemma of § 16, the six edges of the trihedrons 
can be cut by a plane, not through the vertex. Hence hy the previous 
remarks on trihedrons, Desarguesian triangles are obtained without the 
exceptions due to non-intersection, 

19. The two tlieorems of the present and next articles are the 
central theorems of the whole theory of Ideal Points, 




If the bneti {«, b, c are the intersections of three planes a, /3, y of a 
sheaf ^ith a plane tt, not belonging to the sheaf, and if be any 
point not nirident in t, then the three planes Oa, Ob, Oc belong to 
one sheaf. 



Hosted by 



Google 



18-20] COPLANARITY OF LINES 19 

If the axis (r) of the sheaf intersect the plane tt in a point S, then 
the three line.? «, b, c pass throngh 8, and tie line OS is evidently 
contained in Oa, Ob, Oc, and thus forms the axis of the new sheaf. 

Consider now the case when the axis (r) of the sheaf does not 
intersect t. Then a, b, c are not concurrent, and no two of them 
intersect. Hence one of the three (p, say) must lie between [i.e. any 
segment, joining a point on a and a point on c, intersects b] the other 
two. Take any two points L and iV on a and c respectively, then the 
segment LN intersects 6 in a point M. Take two other points P and 
Q on LN so that we have the order P, L, M, N, Q. Take any point 
D one; then the segment PD must intersect a and b in two points 
A and B respectively; and the segment AQ must intersect the 
segment DN in a point G. Then the line BC must intersect the 
segment NQ in a point R. Thus a triangle ABC has been formed, 
whose vertices lie on a, b, c, and whose sides AB, AC, BC pass 
through P, Q, B respectively. 

By taking another point U on c, another triangle A'B'C can be 
similarly formed, whose vertices lie on a, b, c, and whose sides A'B' 
and A'C pass through P and Q respectively. 

We have first to shew that FC passes through R. For taking 
any point T on the axis (r) of the sheaf, the lines TA, TB, TC form 
the edges of one trihedron, and the lines 2"^', TB', TC form the 
edges of another trihedron with the same vertex. 

Also the planes TAA', TBS, TCC belong to the same sheaf. 
Hence the three intersections of the pairs of planes TAB and TA'B', 
TAG and TAG', TBG and TFC' are coplanar; hence they lie in 
the plane TPQ. Hence BC passes through R. 

Now considering the two trihedrons with edges OA, OB, OC, and 
OA', OB', 00', the intersections of the pairs of faces OAB and OA'S, 
OAC and OA'G', OBO and ORG', are respectively OP, OQ, OR ; 
and these are coplanar. Hence by the converse part of Desargues' 
theorem for trihedrons, the planes OAA', OBB', OGG' belong to the 
fiame sheaf. Hence Oa, Ob, Oc belong to the same sheaf {i.e. have 
a common line of intersection). 

20. If any two of the lines a, b, c are coplanar, but the three 
lines are not coplanar, and similarly for the lines a, b, d, then c and d 
are coplanar. 

If a and b intersect, the theorem is evident ; for a, b, c are con- 
current, and '(, b, d are concurrent. Hence c and d are concurrent. 



Hosted by 



Google 



COPLANARITY OF LINES [CH. II 

3 that a and b do not intersect. Then it is easy to prove 
that no two of the Hnes intersect. It follows that uo one of the lines 
c, b, A can intersect any of the planes ab, m, <td in which it does 
not lie. 




Hosted by 



Google 



20] COPLANARITT OF LINES 21 

Hence it follows tliat either c and d lie on opposite sides of the 
plane ab, or d and b on opposite sides of the plane ac, or b and c on 
opposite sides of the plane ad. 

First, let c and d lie on opposite sides of the plane ab (cf. fig. 1). 
Take any point C on c Then the plane Cd must intersect the plane 
ab in a line, d', say. Then the lines a, h, d' are the intersections of 
the three planes da, db, rf(7with the plane ab ; and these three planes 
belong to the same sheaf. Hence (of. g 19) the three planes through 
the lines a, b, d' respectively and through any point not on ab belong 
to the same sheaf. But C is such a point. Hence the planes Ca, 
Cb, Cd' belong to the same sheaf. But c is the common line of Ca 
and Cb. Hence Cd' contains the line c. Hence c and d are coplanar. 

Secondly, let the plane ad lie between b and c. Then the plane be 
must intersect the plane ad in some line, d' say. Thus the three lines 
b, d', c are the intersections of the three planes ab, ad, ac mth the 
plane be. These three planes belong to the same sheaf. Hence 
(cf g 19), if D is any point on d, not on be, the planes Db, Dc, Dd' 
belong to the same sheaf. But Db and Dd' intersect in the line d ; 
hence Dc passes through tlie line d. Thus c and d are coplanar. 

Thirdly, let the plane ae lie between b and d. Then the proof is 
as in the second case, interchanging c and d. 



Hosted by 



Google 



CHAPTER III. 



IDEAL POINTS. 



21, Definition. An 'Associated* Projective Point,' or an 'Ideal 
Point,' is the class of lines which is composed of two coplanar lines, 
a and b, say, and of the lines formed by the intersections of pairs 
of distinct planes through a and b respectively, and of the lines in the 
plane ai which are coplanar with any of the lines of the projective 
point not lying in the plane ab. 

It follows immediately from g 20 that the lines forming a projective 
point are two by two coplanar ; and further that (with the notation 
of the defmition) the lines of the projective point lying in the plane 
afj are the lines in ab coplanar with any me of the lines of the 
projective point not lying in ab. 

Definition. A projective point is termed 'proper,' if the lines 
composing it intersect. Their point of intersection will be called the 
' vertex ' of the point. 

Thus a proper projective point is simply a bundle of lines, and 
every bundle is a proper projective point. 

Definition. A projective point is termed ' improper,' if the lines 
composing it do not intersect. 

It is proved (cf § 24—30) that Projective Geometry holds good of 
projective points as thus defined, when a fitting definition has been 
given of a 'projective line.' 

Definition. A projective point will be said to be ' coherent with ' 
a plane, if any of the lines composing it lie in the plane. 

Definition. A 'projective Kne' is the class of those projective 
points which are coherent with two given pianes. If the planes 
" The word ' Assoeiated ' will usually be omittoil. 



Hosted by 



Google 



21-23] DEPWITIONS OF IDEAL ELEMENTS 23 

intersect, the projective line is called 'proper' ; and the line of inter- 
section is the 'axis.' If the planes do not intersect, the projective 
line is called 'improper.' 

Since Projective Geometry has been developed* from the two 
fundamental ideas of 'point' and 'straight line,' the other definitions 
of projective elements must simply be those which have been given 
in considering Projective Geometry. Thust a projective plane is the 
class of those projective (ideal) points, which lie on any projective 
line joining any given projective point A to any projective point on 
any given projective line not possessing the given projective point A. 

Definition. If a projective plane possesses any proper projective 
points, it will be called a ' proper projective plane.' Otherwise it is an 
'improper projective plane.' 

The vertices of all the proper projective points on a proper pro- 
jective plane will be seen to form a plane (cf. § 26 (a)). 

Dejmiiion. A proper projective point and its vertex are said to be 
'associated,' so likewise are a proper projective lino and its axis, and 
also a proper projective plane and the plane constituted by the vertices 
of its proper projective points. 

22. Since any two lines belonging to a projective point are 
coplanar, it easily follows that any two lines of the projective point 
can be used in place of the two special lines (a and b) used in the 
deiinition (cf. § 21). Hence it can easily be proved that any plane, 
containing one line of a projective point, contains an infinite number 
of such lines. In other words, if a projective point is coherent with 
a plane, an infinite number of the lines of the projective point lie 
in the plane. In fact it follows that, through each point of the plane, 
one line passes which belongs to the projective point. 

23. If three projective points are incident in the same projective 
line, then with any plane, with which two of the projective points 
cohere, the third projective point also coheres. 

First, if the three projective points are proper, the theorem is 
immediately evident. 

Secondly, let two of the projective points, M and N', say, be 
proper, and let the third projective point, L, say, he improper. Let 

■ Cf. Proj. Geom. + Cf. Proj. Geom. § 4. 



Hosted by 



Google 



24 A PROPERTY OP IDEAL LINES [CH. Ill 

the projective line possessing L, M, Nhe defined by the two planes 
irandjr'(cf. Definition ofg2l). Then the three projective points cohere 
with X and n-'. Let ir" be any third plane with which two of the three, 




L, M, and N, cohere. Let Mi and JV, be the vertices of the proi er 
points, M and N. Then M,Ni is a line in the plane tt (if fig * l) 
also the line M,N, belongs to X. Again (cf. § 22) another line r 
exists in jt belonging to L ; and Mi and Nj must lie on the same 
side of r. Let r' be any line in tt belonging to i, and on the opposite 
side of the line r to M, and N, ; such a line exists (cf ^5 22) Let 
be any point of ir on the side of r' remote from M, and I^i. Then 
the segment OM, intersects r and r', in A and A', say; and the 
* Nole in drawing an illustrative figure, it is convenient to make tlie assump- 
tion of § 13, and to consider Descriptive apace as a eocves region in a larger 
Projective Space. Thia region ia marked off by an oval curve in the figure, and an 
ideal point, such as L, is a point outside the oval. Note that the existence of L, 
as an aualogons antitj to M^ and Ni, must not be assumed in the present 
reasoning. 



Hosted by 



Google 



23] A PROPERTY OF IDEAL LINES lo 

segment ON^ intersects r and r\ in B and E, say. The segments 
ANi and BMr intersect, in G, say; the segments B'M^ and A'N^ 
intersect, in C, say. Now project from any point 0' in jt', and two 
trihedrons are formed, nameiy O'A, OB, O'C, and ffA', OB'.O'G', 
with the same vertex (7. Also the homologous feces intersect in the 
three coplanar lines OL, OM„ O'N^. Hence the three planes fJ'AA\ 
O'BE, O'GC are concurrent in a line. Hence the plane O'CG' eon- 
tains the line OO. Therefore GG' passes through 0. Again project 
from any point 0" in tt", and consider the trihedrons 0"A, 0"B, 0"G, 
and a' A', 0"B, O'C. Then the planes 0'AA\ O'BB', 0"CC' are 
concurrent in the same line 0"0. Thus the three lines ff'L, 0"M„ 
0"N, are coplanar. Hence if two of them lie in tt", the third must do 
so also. Hence if two of L, M, N cohere with :r", the third also 
does so. 




Thirdly, let either two or three of i, M, N bo improper. Thus 
let L and M be certainly improper (cf. figs. 2 and .5). In the ])larie ^ 



Hosted by 



Google 



26 



. PROPERTY OF IDEAL LINES 



[CH, in 



form a triangle ABC, sueh that its sides AB, BO, OA belong to 
L, M, N respectively. Thus if iV is a proper point, GA passes 
through N„ the vertex of N: also since the lines BG and AB do not 
int«rsect the line N,ML, the points A, B, G lie on the same side 
of this line (cf. fig. 2) : also since the lines BC and BA do not 
intersect the line N,ML, either C lies on the same side of the line AB 
as JVi, or^ lies on the same side of the line BG b,s N-i. Assume that 
C lies on the same side of AB as N, (cf. fig. 2). The rest of the proof 
for figures 2 and 3 is now identical. In the plane -r, let r be any line 




belonging to X, on the side oi AB remote from C. In the plane «; 
take any point on the side of r remote from G. Then the segments 
OA and OB intersect r, say in A' and B'. Also the line A'N 
intersects the segment OA, and does not intersect the segment AG; 
hence it must intersect the segment 00, say in G'. Then, by pro- 
jecting from any point 0' in the plane t' and by similar reasoning 
to that in the second case, it is proved that the line B'C' belongs 
to M. Then, as in the second case, by projecting from any point 
0" in x", it follows that, if any two of the projective points L, M, N 
cohere with n-", so also does the third. 



24. (a) It follows from g 23 that any two planes, 
both of two given projective points cohere, define the sam 



fith which 
projective 



Hosted by 



Google 



23-26] AXIOMS OF PROJECTIVE GEOMETRY 27 

line as any other pair of such planes. Hence two projective poiots 
determine not more than one projective line, 

(/?) Two projective points determioe at least one projective line. 
For if the points are proper, this is immediately evident. But in any 
ease let the projective points be A and B, and let be any point. 
There are at least two lines, a, and a^, which are members of A and 
such that the plane a,ai does not contain 0. Tlien the planes Oa, 
and 0«2 intersect in a line which passes through and is a member of 
A . Hence through any point there passes a line which is a member of 
a projective point. Hence through there are lines belonging to A 
and B respectively. But these lines determine a plane, with which A 
and B both cohere. Similarly a second such plane can be determined. 
Hence there is a projective line possessing both A and B. 

25. The Axioms of Projective Geometry* can now be seen to be 
true for the 'Projective Elements' as thus defined. Thus we have tlie 
following theorems corresponding to those axioms of the previous tract, 
of which the numbers are enumerated in the initial brackets. 

(I, H, HI.) There is a clas.s of Projective Points, possessing at 
least two members. 

(IV, V, VI, VII, VIII.) If A and B are Projective Points, there 
is a definite projective line AB, whicli (I) is a class of projective 
points, and (2) ia the same as the projective line BA, and (3) possesses 
A and B, and (4) possesses at least one projective point distinct from 
A and B. 

Note that two improper projective points may possess no common 
line. 

{IX and X.) If A and B are projective points, and C is a pro- 
jective point belonging to the projective line AB, and is not identical 
with A, then (J) B belongs to the projective line AC, and (2) the 
projective line -4Cis contained in the projective line AB. 

(XI.) If A and B are distinct projective points, there exists 
at least one projective point not belonging to the projective line AB. 

26. Before considering the proof of the ' axioms ' of the projective 
planet, some further propositions are required. 

(a) Since a line exists through any given point and belonging 
to any given projective point, it easily follows that the set of projective 

' Cf. Praj. Geom. g§ 4, 7, 8, 14. 

t Ct. Proj. Geom., Axioms XII, XIII, XIV. 



Hosted by 



Google 



28 THEOREMS ON IDEAL ELEMENTS [CH, HI 

points cohering with a plane fonn a proper projective plane ; and that 
conversely, any proper projective plane is the set of projective points 
cohering with some plane. 

O) Any projective line intersects any given proper projective 
plane. For through the vertex of any proper projective point on the 
projective plane, a plane passes with which every point of the 
projective line coheres (ef. g 23). This plane intersects the plane 
associated with the projective plane in a line. Two such planes can 
be found. The two lines in the plane associated with the projective 
plane define a projective point which lies both in the projective line 
and the projective plane. 

(y) Two projective lines in a proper projective plane necessarily 
intersect. 

For let «i and m be the projective lines and a he the proper 
projective plane, and a^ its associated plane. Take any point 
outside a,. Then two planes Om and On exist, with which re- 
spectively all projective points of in and n cohere. These planes 
intersect in a line through 0, I, say. Let A be any point in a,. 
The plane Al intersects a, in a line, /', say. The two lines I and I' 
define a projective point which lies in both the projective lines m 
and n. 

(8) Desargues' Theorem holds for triangles formed by projective 
lines and projective points in a proper projective plane. 

By (y) immediately above, no exception arises from non-intersec- 
tion. Then by taking a point external to the associated plane, two 
trihedrons can be formed for which the theorem holds. Hence the 
theorem holds for the proper projective plana 

(i) The projections upon a proper projective plane of three 
projective points belonging to the same projective line also belong to 
a projective line. 

The theorem is immediately evident, if the centre of projection, 
or if any one of the three projective points, is proper. Assume that 
all the projective points are improper. Let L, M, N be the three pro- 
jective points, and iS the projective point which is the centre of 
projection. Let ir be the proper projective plane on to which L, M, N 
are to be projected. Let a be any plane with which i, M, N all 
cohere. On a construct figure 3 of g 23. Project (remembering (^) 
above) the whole figure of associated projective points from iS on to the 
plane tt. Then by the first case of the present theorem, all eolhnear 
groups of projective points which possess a proper projective point are 



Hosted by 



Google 



26, 27] AXIOMS OF THE PROJECTIVE PLANE 29 

projected into oollinear groups. Let A, B,...M, N be projected 
iuto^i, j9i, ...M„Ni. 

Thus, in the plane ir, two homological triangles A,BiCi and 
Ai'Bi'O,' are obtained, AiA,', B,Bi, dCl being concurrent in Oi ; 
also BiAi and B-IA{, Bfii and BiC-^, A^Ci and A^Ci are concurrent 
respectively in Zi, M-^, Ni. Hence, by (S) above, £,, Mi, iVj belong 
to the same projective line. 

27. The next group of propositions correspond to the three axioms 
concerning the projective plane. 

(XII.) If A, B, G are three projective points, which do not 
belong to the same projective line, and A' belongs to the projective 
line BC, and B' to the projective line GA, then the projective lines 
AA' and BB' possess a projective point in common. 

If the projective plane ABG is proper, the theorem follows from 
§ 26 (y). If the projective plane ABG is improper, consider any plane 
with which all the projective points of the projective line BB' cohere. 




Such planes exist. Thus the associated projective plane of such a 
plane is a proper projective plane containing the line BB'. But by 
g 26 (j3) the projective line AA' intersects this proper projective plane, 
in the projective point D, say. Also by § 26 (t) the projections of 
B, A', C from A on to this proper projective plane belong to the 
same projective line. Hence D belongs to BB". Thus AA' and BB' 
intersect. 

(XIII.) If A, B, G are three projective points, not belonging to 
the same projective line, then there exists a projective point not 
belonging to the projective plane ABC. 

This follows immediately from Peano's Axiom XV given in g 6 
above. 



Hosted by 



Google 



30 HARMONIC RANGES [CH. Ill 

28. The theory of Harmonic Ranges must now be coiiaidered. 

Li;t A, B be any two points, Ca point in the segment AB. Take 
F any point outside the line AB, and H any point on the segment 
li'C, and let EG he as in figure 1. Then the point D, if it exist, is 




fig. 1. 

tlie iiarmonic conjugate of C with respect to A and B. By considering 
the associated projective points and the associated projective lines, the 
requisite harmonic conjngate (as a projective point) always exists. 
Thus, on the basis of the axioms of Projective Geometry already 
proved, the proof for the uniqueness of the harmonic conjugate in the 
associated projective geometry holds good*. Thus iu the original 
Descriptive Geometry, the harmonic conjugate, if it exist, is unique. 

Furthermore, since M is on the segment FC, E and G are re- 
spectively on the segments AF&i\A FB. Hence D, if it exist, cannot 
lie on the segment AB. Conversely, if D is any point on the line AB, 
say on the side of B remote from A, take E any point on the segment 
AF, tlien DE must intersect the segment BF. Hence AG and BE 
miist intersect in H, on the segments AG and BF. 'ITierefore J*"^ 
intersects the segment AB. Thus the harmonic conjugate with respect 
to A and B of any point on the line AB, not on the segment AB, 
must exist, and lies on the segment A B. 

Furthermore, if D lies on the side of B remote from A, and C" 
lies on the segment BC, let FC' and EB intersect in H' ; and AH' 
intersect the segment FB in G'. Then since C lies in the segment 
BG, H' lies in the segment BH, and G' lies in the segment BG. 
Hence D' exists and lies iu the segment BD. Thus as C moves 
towards B, D also moves in the opposite direction towards fit. 
* Cf. Proj. Geom. gg 6 and 7. t Cf. Proj. Geom. g 17 (,8). 



Hosted by 



Google 



28, 29] ORDER OF IDEAL POINTS 31 

Hence it is easily seen tliat the segment AB is divided into three 
parts by reference to the harmonic conjugates of pobts in it with 
respect to A and B. The part formed by the segment AKi (cf. fig. 2), 



Fig. 2. 

exchisive of -i and Ki, contains the points whose harmonic conjugates 
lie on the side of A remote from B ; the segment 5^3, exchisive of 
B and K^, contains the points whose harmonic conjugates lie on the 
side of B remote from A ; the segment KiK^, inclusive of K^ and K^, 
contains the points for which the liarmonic conjugates do not exist 
It is not necessary tliat the points K, and K^ be distinct. If they 
coincide, the segment KiK^, inclusive of Kj and jffs, shrinks into a 
single point K. Thus in Euclidean Geometry the middle point of any 
segment AB is this degenerate portion of the segment. 

It immediately follows that Fauo's axiom* is satisfied for proper 
projective lines. Hence, remembering that the harmonic relation is 
projective!, we have: 

{XIV.) If A and B are distinct projective points, and C is a 
projective point of the projective Hue AB, distinct from A and B, 
then the harmonic conjugate of C, with respect to A and B, is 
distinct from C. 

Also the restriction to three dimensions follows at once from 
Peano's Axiom XVI of g 6, giving the same restriction for Descriptive 
Geometry, Hence we find : 

(XV.) If a be any projective plane, and A be any projective point 
not lying in a, any projective point P lies on some line joining A to 
some projective point on a. 

29. The order of the projective points on a projective line must 
now be considered. 

If the projective line is proper, the order of the proper projective 
points on it will he defined to correspond to the order of the associated 
points. Thus (cf. fig, 2 of g 28) if the points marked in the figure are 
projective points, as C moves from A to K„ excluding K„ the projec- 
tive point D, which is the harmonic conjugate to G with respect to A 
and B, moves fix>m G through all the proper projective points on the 
* Cf, Proj. Oeom, § 8, t Cf, Proj. Geom. g 9 (3). 



Hosted by 



Google 



32 THE DEDEKIND PROPERTY [CH. Ill 

side of A remote from B ; and as C moves from Zj, eseluding K^, 
to B, D moves towards B through all tlie proper projective points 
on the side of B remote from A. 

Now let the order of the improper projective points be defined so 
as to make the above tlieorem hold generally : thns as C moves from 
Ki to ATs, including K^ and K^, let the order of the improper 
projective points through which D moves be snch that B passes 
continually in the same direction round the line from the proper 
projective points on the side of A remote from B to the proper 
projective points on the side of B remote from A. 

Then by theorem (o) of § 17 of the Tract on Projective Geometry, 
the order as thus defined agrees with the order as defined in ^ 14 
and 15 of that Tract, Also the order on the improper projective 
lines is obtained from the order on the proper projective lines by 
projection. Since the harmonic property ia projective, the orders 
obtained thus by different projections must agree. Also from Peano's 
axioms of the segments of the Descriptive line given in g 3 above, 
it follows that the Projective axioms of order* are satisfied, namely : 

(XVI.) If A, B, G are distinct projective points on tlie same 
projective line, and i> is a projective point on segm {ABffj'f, not 
identical either with A or C, then D belongs to segm (BCA). 

(XVII.) If A, B, C are distinct projective points on the same 
projective line, and i> is a projective point belonging to both 
segm (SCA) and segm (CAB), then D cannot belong to segm (ABC). 

(XVIII.) If A, B, C are distinct projective points on the same 
projective line, and i> is a projective point, distinct from B, and 
belonging to segm (AB(f) [which excludes A and O], and B belongs 
to &egm(ADC), then E belongs to segm (ABC). 

30, Finally, the Dedekind property J for the jirojective line 
follows immediately from it* assumption for Descriptive Geometry 
(cf. § 9 above). 

Thus all the axioms for Projective Geometry, including the axioms 
of order and the Dedekind property, are satisfied by the Projective 
Points and the Projective Lines. Furthermore the proper projective 
points evidently form a convex region in the projective space formed 
by the projective points. Also the geometry of this convex region of 

* Cf. Proj. Qeom. § 14. 

t i.e. on the segment between A and C not poBseBeing B, cf. Proj. Geom. § 13, 

J Cf. Proj. Geom. § 19 (a). 



Hosted by 



Google 



29, 30] THE DEDEKIND PROPERTY 33 

proper projective points corresponds step by step with the geometry of 
the original descriptive space. Thus the geometry of descriptive space 
can always be investigated by considering it ae a convex region in a 
projective space. This simply amounts to considering the associated 
proper projective points and adding thereto the improper projective 
points. A particular case arises when the Euclidean axiom (cf. § 10, 
above) is assumed. Tlie improper projective points then lie on a single 
improper projective plane. Thus in Euclidean Geometry when the 
' plane at infinity ' is considered, the associated projective geometry has 
been introduced, and this plane is the single improper projective plane. 



Hosted by 



Google 



CHAPTER IV. 

GENERAL THEORY OF COREESPONDENCE. 

31. In this chapter the general ideas of Correspondences, or 
Transformations, and of groups of transformations are explained, and 
thus the idea of continuous motion is led up to. 

Consider any proposition respecting two entities p and q ; let it be 
denoted hy ^ (;*, q). The proposition may be varied by replacing 
P and q by two other entities, say u and v, so that the new proposition 
is <^ {u, v). Thus we arrive at the notion of a constant form common 
to all the propositions of the type ^ (x, y), where x and y are any two 
entities such that a significant proposition results when jc and y replace 
p and q m ^ (p, q)- Note that a false proposition is significant ; an 
insignificant proposition is not in tmth a proposition at all, it is a 
sequence of ideas lacking the type of unity proper to a proposition. 

The constant form of the proposition ^ (ie, y), as x and y vary, may 
be said to constitute a relation between x and y, in those special eases 
for which '^{i«,y) is a true proposition. The order of a: and y in 
respect to this relation represents the special roles of jk and y 
respectively in the proposition ^ {w, y). Thus if this relation is called 
B, 'w has the relation R to y,' or more briefly xRy, is equivalent to 
the proposition ^{i,y), however jrandy be varied. It is evident that 
we might have considered the relation indicated by the proposition in 
such form that, if it be denoted by E, y'tt'x represents <^ {x, y). Then 
J? and R are called mutually converse relations. It is evident that 
each relation has one and only ono corresponding converse relation. 

When xRy holds, x is called the referent and y the relatum. } 
relation is said to be a one-one relation when to each referent there i 
only one relatum, and to each relatum there ih only one referent. Fo. 
example, MaRb and aRc both hold, where b and c are distinct entities, 
then the relation B is not one-one. 



Hosted by 



Google 



31, 32] DEFINITION OF A RELATION 35 

The class of all the referents in respect to a relation is called the 
domahi of the relation, and the class of all relata is the converse 
domain. ,, In mathematics a one-one relation is often spoken of as a trans- 
formation (or correspondence) of the members of its domain into (or 
with) the corresponding members of the converse domain. The corre- 
spondence is definite and reversible, and constitntes a rule by which 
we can pass from any member of one class to a corresponding definite 
member of the other class. 

For example, the equation, 

constitutes a one-one relation of all real numbers, positive or negative, 
to the same class of real nnmbers. This brings out the fact that the 
domain and the converse domain can be identical. 

Again, a projective relation between all the points on one line of 
projective space and all the points on another (or the same) line 
constitutes a one-one relation, or transformation, or correspondence, 
between the points of the two lines. Any one-one relation of which 
both the domain and the converse domain are each of them al! the 
points of a projective space will be called a one-one point corre- 



32. By reasoning* based upon the axioms of Projective Geometry, 
without reference to any idea of distance or of congruence, coordinates 
can be introduced, so that the ratios of four coordinates characterize 
each point, and the equation of a plane is a homogeneous equation of 
the first degree. Let JT, Y, Z, U be the four coordinates of any 
point ; then it will be more convenient for us to work with non- 
homogeneous coordinates found by putting x for JCjU, y for Y!U, 
z for ZIU. Accordingly the actual values of w, y, s are, as usual, the 
coordinates characterizing a point. AU points can thus be represented 
by finite values of se, y, z, except points on the plane, U~ 0. For these 
points some or all of x, y, and » are infinite. In order to deal with 
this plane either recourse must be had to the original homogeneous 
coordinates, or the limiting values of ar to y to ^ must be considered as 
they become infinit*. 

The plane, x = 0, is called the yz plane, the line, y = 0, z = 0, ia 
called the axis of as, and the plfuie, U^O, is called the infinite 
plane. 

■ Ct. Proj. Geoni, eba- vi. and vii. 

3—2 



Hosted by 



Google 



36 ONE-ONE POINT COEEESPONDBNCES [CH. IV 

When the fundarcental tfitrahedroii is changed, the coordinates are 
changed according to the formula 

Y'-<T{ai,X + (hiY+aaZ + aitU], 
Z' = (T{«5,X + a3j Y+a^Z+OuUi, 
U' = ir{a,X-i-(h Y+a, Z+a^ U\. 
Hence the non-homogeneons coordinates are transformed by the 
formula 

a/ = {ono; + <h?.y + «ia3 + «iO/(«i« + a-iy + a^z + a^, 
y' = {a^x + a^^y + at^z + <hi)K'^i^ + <^?/ + "s^ ■*" (h\ 
s" = ((fjiiC + (h^y + ftss^ + awVCai^ + any + aj? + a,)- 
But if the infinite pUne is the same in both cases, tlie formula for 
transformation becomes 

x' = «iia; + M,2^ + ai^z + On, 
with two similar equations. 

33. A one-one point correspondence can be characterized by 
formulae giving the coordinates of any relatum in terms of those of 
the corresponding referent. It must be remembered that every point 
is both a relatum and a referent. Let the correspondence under 
consideration be called T, then the coordinates of the relatum of any 
point in, y, z will be written Tx, Ty, Tz. Thus we have, 

Jfe - ^, {x, y, £), Ty^^, (x, y, z), Tz = -/■> (x, y, z), 
where the functions ^, <^, ^s are defined for every point of space and 
are single- valued. Furthermore, since the correspondence, being one- 
one, is reversible, it must be possible to solve these equations for x, y, 
and z, obtaining 

x^f,(Tx,Ty,Tz), y=^<^^{Tx,Ty,Tz), z^f;iTx,Ty,Tz). 

Let this converse relation be written T-i, and let the coordinates of 
the relatum of any point x, y, z be written T^x, T^y, T,z. Then 
x^T,Tx^TT,x, y=T,Ty^TT>y, z = T^Tz^TT,z. 

Then, remembering that by properly choosing x, y, z we can take 
Tx, Ty, Ts to be any point of space, we find 

T^x^<i.,{x,y,z), Zy = i',(x,y,z), T,z = <if,{x,y,z). 
where ip-^, \j/s, ^3 are defined for every point of space and are single: 
valued. 



Hosted by 



Google 



32-35] FINITE CONTINUOUS OROUPS 37 

34. Consider* the one-one point correspondence (T) defined by 
Tx^^ {x,y,z, a,, «3,...«r), Ty = <f>^ (x,y, z, «i, a^,...a,.), 

where <i], as,...ar are r parameters. Let the parameters be assumed to 
be eflfective, so that two different choices of special values for them 
necessarily produce different correspondences. Then by varying the 
parameters an assemblage of correspondences is produced, each corre- 
spondence being defined by a particular choice of the parameters 

Now let S and T be any two members of this assemblage. Then 
STx, i.e. 8(Tai), STy, and STz obviously are the coordinates of a point 
which is related to the point {x, y, z) by a one-one point correspondence. 
This correspondence is denoted by 8T. Now, if BT is necessarily a 
member of the assemblage whenever 8 and T are both members of it, 
the assemblage is called a group. When each correspondence of the 
group is defined by t effective parameters, where r is a finite number, 
the group is called finite and f-limbed. The group is said to be 
continuous, if^ B and T being any two different transformations of the 
group, whenever the parameters of B vary continuously and ultimately 
approach those of T as their limits, then, for every value of m, y, z, 
also 8x, Sy, 8z vary continuously and approach Tx, Ty, Tz as their 
limits. 

The assumption that ^i, -^i, ^3 are analytical functions of their 
arguments, x, y, s, ai,...a^, secures that the group ia continuous. 

35. The identical one-one point correspondence, il say, is such 
that, for every value of x, y, z, 

Ox^x, ili/=y, ilz = z (I). 

Finite Continuous Transformation Groups exist which do not 
contain the identical transformation. But the chief interest of the 
subject is concerned with those which do contain it. Let a,\ ai,---a^ 
be the value-system of the parameters for which the corresponding 
transformation of the group is the identical transformation O, so that 

ilx = x = ^,{x,y^z,a^\a^°,...aj') (2), 

with two similar equations. 

• Cf. Vorlesungen. iiier Continuierliche Gmppen, by Lie, oh. ti. § 2. 



Hosted by 



Google 



38 INFINITESIMAL TRANSFORMATIONS [CH. IV 

For brevity put 

r"'-%r"" ''-).,...„.,r-(-.^.')"'-.('-'.^--) w 

Now any transformation (7^ of the group can be expressed in the 
form 

Ti/ = ipi(x,ff,s,ai° + e,t,(h'' + eit,...,ar'' + ert)[ (4). 

JJE = <fe (x, y, z, a," + g, *, Os" + ea*, . . . , a/ + 6,1)] 
Hence, since the functions ^, <^i, ^ are analytic, if t is not too 
large, we find, remembering equations (2) and (3), 

Tx = x-vt{e^t\-^e^i-i-\- ■■■ + ^r^;-) + terms involving i!*', f, etc. ] 
7i/ = j + ((eii7, + ^3ifc + ... + er^jr) + terms involving f', ^, etc. \ (5). 
r^ = s + ^ (ei t, + e,4 + ■ - + B,.Q + terms involving f, t\ etc. ) 
Hence in the limit when ( diminishes indefinitely, writing 

Tio-x-^-y-t, etc., 
at ' ' 
we find 

:s7 = «ifi + ^4+-+a,.\ 



^-t','A-<^='/---r«,7,, ^D>. 

'ITiese equations define the infinitesimal transformations of the 
group, every value-system of ratios of Si, e,, ...fir defining one Infini- 
tesimal Transformation. 

36. Conversely by integrating equations (6) of g 35, it can be 
proved that the form of any finite transformation of the group can be 
recovered. Assume that we have found in this way 

^-/iit,C,C^,C,), y^A(t,C„C^,C,), z=Mt,C„C„C,), 
where C,, C2, C, are the constants introduced by the integration. Let 



Hosted by 



Google 



35-37] LATENT ELEMENTS 39 

'"at %< ^a ^ tlie values of x, y, z when ( = 0. Thtn trom tl e above 
equatioES it can be proved to be possible, ow y to tl e pr perties of 
the continuous group of one-one transformatioi s to Ive f i Ci, d, Os 
in terms of x^, y^, £„. Thus we obtain agaii &]_ at (i) of § 35, 
namely 

with two similar equations, where w^, y„, s^, now correspond ia x, y, z 
in those equations, and x, y, z to T^, Ty, Tz. 

But it is not true that^ if any equations of the same form as 
equations (6) of §35 he written down, where ^i,..., ^ are any 
arbitrarily chosen functions of is, y, z, the integral forms give the finite 
transfonnations of an r-limbed finite continuous group. For in 
equations (6) of § 35, ii,..., £r are derived from equations (3) of § 35, 
that is to say, they are partial differential coefiicients of functions with 
special properties. The enunciation of the conditions to be satisfied 
by ii, -■-, Ir, so that a jvnite continuous group of transformations may 
result from the integration of the corresponding equations, is called the 
Second Fundamental Theorem of the subject. It is not required here. 

Also if ei, €;.,... Br are kept unchanged, then the assemblage of 
transformations found by the variation of t in equations (4) of § 35 
form a one-limbed continuous group, which is defined by the single 
infinitesimal transformation which it contains, namely that one corre- 
sponding to the given value-system of e,, ej, ...er- Also every finite 
transformation is a member of the one-iimbed group produced by the 
indefinite repetition of some infinitesimal transformation. 

37. A latent point of a transformation is a point which is trans- 
fonned into itself. A latent curve or surface is such that any point of 
it is transformed into some point on the same curve or surface. 

It is evident that the latent points, lines, and surfaces of any 
infinitesimal transformation ate also latent for every finite transfor- 
mation belonging to the one-limhed group defined by it. They are 
called the latent points, lines, and surfaces of the group. 

The transformations which leave a given surface latent must form 
a group, for the successive application of two such transformations still 
leaves the surface latent. Also the assemblage of the infinitesimal 
transformations which leave a surface Jatent must he the infinitesimal 
transformations of a continuous transformation group. 



Hosted by 



Google 



40 THE CORRESPONDENCE OF NEIGHBOURHOODS [CH. IV 

38. If a reentrant single-branched curve a (which may be a straight 
line) is transformed by an infinitesimal transformation of a continuous 
group into a curve A then the senses* round, or directions round, the 
curves correspond in a perfectly definite manner, the same for all such 
infinitesimal transformations. 

In order to make clear the correspondence of directions round any 
two reentrant single-branched curves a and /i, let OP,L and O/'ei 
define two complementary segments round a, and let O'QiJIf and (/QiM 
define two complementary segments round ^. Now consider any 
one-one point transformation which (1) transforms o into ^, (2) trans- 
forms segments of a into segments of ,8, (3) transforms into 0'. 
Then one of the two following mutually exclusive cases must hold, either 
one of the two, CQiJ/and the relatum of OP^L, contains the other, or 
one of the two, O'Q^M and the relatum of OP^L contains the other. 
If one of the two, O'Q^M and the relatum of OP^L, contains the other, 
then the segments OPjL and O'Qi^wili be said to correspond in sense 
where and 0' are corresponding origins. Also we shall consider an 
arbitrary small portion of a containing as the neighbourhmd of ; 
thus divides its neighbourhood into two parts, one lying in tlie 
segment OP^L, and the other in the segment OPJj. Similarly 0' 
divides its neighbourhood on (8 into two partss. Then the case con- 
templated above, when the segments OP^L and O'QiM correspond in 
sense with and 0' as corresponding origins, will also be expressed by 
saying that corresponds to 0' and the neighbourhood of in the 
segment OPiL corresponds to the neighbourhood of 0' in the segment 
O'QM 

Now considering the case of an infinitesimal transformation, the 
curve ff must lie infinitesimally near to the curve a, so that the point 
Qi may be assumed to be a point infinitesimally near to the point Pi 
and the point Q^ to be a point infinitesimally near to the point P^. 
Then no point of the segment OPjL which is infinitesimally near to Pi 
is infinitesimally near to any point on the segment O'QsM. Hence the 
segments OP^L and O'ftil/must correspond in sense with and 0' as 
corresponding origins. Thus only one of the two cases of corre- 
spondence in sense is now possible. 

Notice that for this theorem the curves o. and /3 need not be distinct, 
nor need the points and 0'. 

If a straight line / is latent for a transformation, and is a latent 
point on it, and segments with origin correspond in sense with 

* Cf. Froj. Geom. g 15, eitended to any 



Hosted by 



Google 



38] THE COERESPONDENCE OF NEIGHBOURHOODS 41 

themselves, then the line is said to be tranafonned directly in tlie 
neighbourhood of 0, in the other case it is said to be transformed 
inversely in the neighhonrhood of 0. 

Thns it follows as a corollary from the above proposition that an 
infinitesimal transformation, which leaves latent a line and also a 
point on it, transforms the line directly in the neighbourhood of 0. 
Hence also it follows that any finite transformation of the one-limbed 
group defined by the infinitesimal transformation, transforms the line 
directly in the neighbourhood of 0- 

Similar theorems hold with respect to surfaces. It is sufficient for 
us to consider a transformaiion for which (I) a given straight line I is 
latent and also a point on it, and (2) the relata of planes through I 
are planes and the relata of straight lines through are straight lines. 
The general extension is obvious. 

The portion of a plane through 0, which lies within an arbitrarily 
small convex surface (cf. g 11) which contains within it, will be 



called the neighbourhood of 0. The axis I divides into two parts the 
neighbourhood of on a plane p through I ; call them pi and p^ . Let 
the plane q be tlie relatum of ^ with respect to the transformation, and 
let the two parts of its neighbourhood, as divided by I, be q^ and q^. 
Let a line through in p cut the convex surface in F„ Pg ; and let 
the relatum of the line in q cut the surface in §,, Q^; also let OFi 
stand for the segment of the line in the neighbourhood^, and so on. 
Then (assuming that continuous lines are transformed into con- 
tinuous lines) if OF, and OQ, correspond in sense, the same must hold 
for all similar parts of corresponding lines through in the neighbour- 



Hosted by 



Google 



42 THE GENERAL PROJECTIVE GROUP [CH. IV 

hoods p, and q,. The neighbourhoods p, and q, will then be said to 
correspond in sense. Also if p is latent, it will be said to be trans- 
formed directly in the neighbourhood of with I as axis, if the 
neighbourhood pi corresponds to itself in sense. 

Now, if the transformation is infinitesimal, it follows at once from 
the ease of curves, that a definite one of the two neighbourhoods 
q, and q^ must correspond in sense with ft, and that, if the plane p is 
latent, it must be transformed directly in the neighbourhood of with 



39. The general projective group of one-one point correspondences 
is the group of those transformations which transform planes into planes. 
Such transformations must therefore transform straight lines into 
straight lines, and must leave unaltered all projective relations between 
sets of points on lines. 

Now, if in such a transformation three points A, B, Con a line I 
are known to be transformed into A', B, C" on a line l\ the relatum 
on I' of every point on I is determined. For, by the Fundamental 
Theorem* one and only one projective relation can be established 
between the points on I and those on f, such that A corresponds to A', 
if to 5", and C to C. ITius the given transformation must transform 
I into i according to this relation. 

Hence it follows that if four points, A, B, C, D on b, plane jo, no 
three of which are coUinear, are known to be transformed into A', B', 
C, ff on a plane p', the relatum on p' of every point on^ is determined. 
For let AD meet BG in B, and A'D' meet BC in E'. Then £" 
corresponds to E. Hence A, B, Eon AB correspond to A', B, E' on 
A'B'. Hence the relatum on A'B' of every point on AB is detenuined, 
and similarly for BG and EC, and for GA and G'A'. But through any 
point i* on ^ a line I can be drawn cutting BC, CA, AB in L, M, N. 
Thus the relata on p' of i, M, N, namely L', M', N' on f , are deter- 
mined. Thus the relatum of every point on I is determined. Hence 
the rektum of P is determined. 

Similarly, ii A, B, C, B, E are five points, no four of which are 
coplanar, and if for any projective transformation their relata are 
determined, then the relatum of every point is determined. Accordingly 
a projective transformation is completely determined when the relata 
of five points, no four of which are coplanar, are determined. 

• Of. Proj. Geom. § 9 (y). 



Hosted by 



Google 



38-40] INFINITESIMAL PROJECTIVE TRANSFORMATIONS 43 

40. Now consider transformations of the type 

Ty = (a^x + «%y + 025^ + a^)l((h!c + a^ + a^z + 1) \ ...{1). 
Tz = («!,i« + Mjji/ + ass3 + aii)l((iiX + o^y + OsS + 1) J 

They obviously belong to the general projective group as defined 
above. Also there are fifteen effective parameters. But if we 
substitute for x, y, s the coordinates of a given point A, and for 
Tx, Ty, Tz the coordinates of a given point A', three equations are 
obtained between the parameters. Let the same be done for B and B', 
C and 0', D and U, E and W. Then in all fifteen equations ate 
found. Also if no four of A, B, 0, D, E are coplanar, and no four of 
A', B', C, D\ E' are coplanar, these equations are consistent, and 
definitely determine the transformation T. Hence (cf. § 39) the 
equations (1) can, by a proper choice of parameters, be made to 
represent any assigned transformation of the general projective group. 
Hence the transformations represented by them are those of the whole 
general projective group. 

It is obvious from the form of these equations that the group is 
a fifteen-limbed continuous transformation-group. To find its infini- 
tesimal trauafoimations, put 
ajj= 1 +Oji^, ai2 = ii,2(, ai3 = ai3(, an = on*, «i = "i', (1%—°^% «3 = «3^, etc. 

Then we find that the analogues of equations (G) of § 85 are 

^ - a„« + a,.y + o.^^Z \ a^^~ X (n.^ + "a^/ + "s^J | 

^ = aji3: + a;23' + <«iisS + '^-2'("i« + "3y + "s2) \ (2). 

^^ — . _ / + + «1 

These equations give the general form of an lufinitesimal trans- 
formation of the general projective group. 



Hosted by 



Google 



CHAPTER V. 

AXIOMS OP CONGRUENCE. 

41. The logical analysis of the method of superposition as applied 
to geometrical proofs is now to be undertaken. In this method a 
figure is said to move unchanged till it arrives at coincidence with 
some other figure. But what moves? Certaiuly not the points of the 
spa«e. For they remain where they are. If it is some physical body 
occupying space which moves, then the assumption, that the body 
remains unchanged in its motion, involves the very comparison 
between the assemblage of points occupied in one position with that 
occupied in another position, which the supposition was designed to 
explain. Accordingly we find that Paseh* in eiVeet treats 'congruence' 
as a fundamental idea not definable in terms of the geometrical concepts 
which we have already acquired. He states ten axioms of congruence 
in a form applicable to Descriptive Geometry. They are as follows, 
where the single capital letters represent points, and the figures are 
the ordered assemblages of the points mentioned, ordered in the order 
of mention. 

I. The figures AB and BA are congruent. 

II. To the figure ABC, one and only one point F can be added, 
so that AB and AB' are congruent figures and B lies in the segment 
ACm Cm the segment AB. 

III. If the point C lies in the segment AB and the figures 
ABCmA A'B'C are congruent, then the point C lies in the segment 
A'B'. 

IV. If the point Ci lies in the segment ^fi, and the segmented 
is lengthened by the segment C\C, which is congruent to it, and AC^ 
is lengthened by the segment C^Ca, congruent to AC,, and so on, then 
finally a segment C„C«+i is arrived at which contains the point B. 



Hosted by 



Google 



41, 42] CONGRUENCE AS A FUNDAMENTAL IDEA 45 

V. If in the figure A BC the segments A C and BC are congruent, 
then the figures ABC and BA are congruent. 

VI. If two figures are congruent, so also are their homologous 
parts congruent. 

VII. If two figures are each congruent to a third figure, they are 
congruent to each other. 

VIII. If of two congruent figures one is enlarged by the addition 
of a point, the other can be similarly enlarged so that the enlarged 
figures are congruent. 

IX. If AB and FGH are any two given figures, F, G, H being 
not collinear, and AB is congruent to FG, then in any plane containing 
AB exactly two points C and D can be found such that the figures 
ABC and ABD are each congruent to FGH, and furthermore the 
segment CD has a point in common with the line AB. 

X. Two figures ABGD and ABCE vAikV are not plane figures 
are not congruent. 

42. These axioms at once suggest the analysis and definition of 
congruence in terms of our previouaiy stated geometrical concepts. 
This analysis was first successfully achieved by Lie*. 

Any point of space may be supposed to move with the rigid figure 
when the method of superposition is applied. Accordingly, considering 
the explanations of chapter IV, we see at once that a superposition 
is in fact a one-one point transformation. Let this special class of 
point transformations be caUed motions. We have now to consider 
whether the peculiar properties of motions can be defined in terms of 
the geometrical ideas already on hand. 

If a rigid body is transferred from position a to position j3, and 
then from ^ to y, the finai transformation defined is the same as if it 
were transferred directly from a to y. Thus the successive application 
of two motions produces a motion. But this is the characteristic group 
property. 

What Lie has succeeded in doing is to define in geometrical terms 
the properties which must be possessed by a complete group of motions. 
But now the explanations of the preceding paragraphs are found to be 

* C(. two papers lij Lie in the Leipziger Beriohte, 1890. These investigations 
are reproduced in a. much ealarged (orm in the TheoTie dtr Transformntiom^ruppen, 
vol. ill. part V. Bat Lie's line of thought was not that suggested above. He starts 
from an almost sncoessful solution of the same problem by Helmholtz, of. Ueber die 
ThaUachen, die der Geometrie za Grande Uegen, Gdtt. Nachr. 1868, and Collected 
Works, vol. II. 



Hosted by 



Google 



46 lie's first solution [ch- v 

to some extent faulty. For they implicitly assume that there is one 
definite group of motions, as indeed our sensations of the physical 
world do in fact seem to give us special intelligence of one such definite 
group in physical space. However it will be found that an indefinite 
number of groups of one-one point transformations exist which satisfy 
Lie's definitions of the properties of a complete group of motions. 
Accordingly a motion when one special group is being considered is not 
a motion when another such group is considered. 

A group of motions is called a congruence-group, and the 
definitions of the characteristics of such a group are called the axioms 
of Congruence. 

43. Lie's results, as expressed by himself, are as follows ; 

Definition*. A finite continuous group in the variables it,, Xs,---x^ 
is called transitive, if in the space {xj, Xi,--.a:n) an »-fold extended 
region exists, within which each point can be transformed into any 
other point through at least one transformation of the group. 

Definitim^. A real continuous group of three-fold extended 
space possesses at the real point P free mobility in the infinitesimal, 
if it satisfies the following conditions : If a point P and an arbitrary 
real line-element passing through it are fixed, continuous motion is still 
possible ; but if, in addition to P and that Une-element, an arbitrary 
real surface-element, passing through both is held fixed, then shall no 
continuous motion be further possible. 

Tlworem%. (l) If a real continuous projective group of ordinary 
three-fold extended space possesses without exception in all real points 
of this space free mobility in the infinitesimal, then it is six-Hmbed and 
transitive, and consists of all real projective transformations through 
which a not- exceptional imaginary surface of the second degree, vrhich 
is represented by a real equation [e.g. a^ + y + s^ + l =0], remains 
invariant (latent). 

(2) If a real continuous projective group of ordinary three-fold 
extended space possesses free mobility in the infinitesimal, not in all 
real points of this space but only in all real points of a certain region, 
then it is six-limbed and transitive and ie either the continuous real 
projective group of a not-exceptional real not-ruled surface of the 

• Cf. TheorU der TTansfommtionsgruppen, vol. i. § S8. 
+ Cf. loi:. cit., vol, in. §98. 
J Cf. Lie, ioc. cit. vol. ni. § 98. 



Hosted by 



Google 



42-45] lie's second solution 47 

second degree [i.e. with this surface latent], or it is by means of a real 
projective transformation similar to the group of Euclidean motions. 

The above constitutes what Lie calls his 'first solution of the 
Riemann*-Helmholtz Problem.' 

The axioms which are implicit in this solution appear to be the 
following : 

(1) A congruence-group is a finite continuous group of one-one 
point transformations, containing the identical transformation. 

(2) It is a sub-group of the general projective group. 

(3) An infinitesimal transformation belonging to it can always be 
found satisfying the condition, tliat any definite line and any definite 
point on the line are latent. 

(i) No infinitesimal transformation of the group exists such that 
a line, a point on it, and a plane through it, shall all be latent. 

44. Lie'st 'second solution of the Riemann-HelmholtK Problem ' 
consists of the theorem that the following axioms completely 
characterize a complete assemblage of Euclidean or non-Euclidean 
Motions : 

(1) The motions form a real continuous group defined by in- 
finitesimal transformations. 

(2) If any arbitrary real point (yi", ^2°, j/j") is fixed, then the real 
points (x,, x^, iFs), into which it is possible to move any real point 
(xi", x^, Xi"), satisfy a real equation of the form 

^(^i". y^"' yi i ^"1 ^a'l ^3" j ^i> ^2> ^i) - Oi 
which is not satisfied by 3^1 = ^1°, x^-y", x^-ys, and which represents 
a real surface passing through (ar," x^, xf). 

(3) Round any point {gi, y", yf) a finite three-fold region exists, 
such that, when {y,^, y.^, y,') is fixed, any other point (x,", xi, x^") 
can be moved through an irreducible continuous sequence of points up 
to any point satisiying the above equation of (2). 

45. The conception of a ^finite continuous group, though it is 
simple enough analytically, does not seem to correspond to any of the 
obvious and immediate properties of congruence-transformations as 
presented by sense-perceptions. The following set of axioms conform 
more closely to the obvious properties of congruence-transformations ; 

* Riemann's work in this oooneotion ie contained in his Habilitationsrcde, 
I7e6cr die Hypotkesen, viekhe der Geometrie la Grande Uegen, 1834, cf. iiis Collected 
Works, and also a translation in the Collected Works ot W. K. Clifford. 

t Cf. loc. cit. vol. m. § 102. 



Hosted by 



Google 



48 A THIRD DEFINITION OF CONGRUENCE [CH. V 

they are based upon, and are modifications of, a set of congriience- 
axiome given by Peano*. 

(1) The assemblage of congruence -transformations is a sub-group 
of the general projective group. 

(2) The group contains the converse of every transformation 
belonging to it. 

(3) Given any two points and O, and any two lines I and I 
through and 0' respectively, and any two planes t and jt' through 
I and I respectively, one and only one transformation of the group 
exists which transforms into O, I into V, t into jt', so that the two 
neighbourhoods of OomI correspond in an assigned manner with the two 
neighbourhoods of O on l, and the two neighbourhoods of on tt as 
divided by I correspond in an assigned manner with the two neigh- 
bourhoods of 0' on it' as divided by f. 

(4) Given any line and any point on that line, an infinitesimal 
traiistbrmation of the group exists such that the line and the point 
are latent. 

Comparing these axioms with those of § 43 which are required for 
Lie's 'first solution,' it will be found that practically 'finite and 
continuous ' is left out of the first axiom of g 43, but on the other 
hand the fourth axiom Is strengthened into the form of axiom (3) of 
this article. 

The following chapters will be based upon these axioms. 



It follows immediately from axioms (2) and (3) that 
the identical transformation is the only member of the group for 
which a given point is latent, and a given line through the point is 
latent, being transformed directly in the neighbourhood of the point, 
and a given plane through the line is latent, being transformed directly 
in the neighbourhood of the point with respect to the line as axis. 

For with the notation of axiom (3) let The such a transformation 
with respect to the point 0, the line /, and the plane t. Also let 8 be 
the transformation of the group which transforms 0, /, and tt, into 0', 
t, and it', in a specified way according to axiom (3) ; and let 5, be the 
converse of B which also belongs to the group. Then the transforma- 
tion 8T belongs to the group, and transforms 0, I, -a into O, I, ir' 
according to the same specified way as S. Hence by axiom (3), we 
have ST - S. ITius operating with S,, we have 8^8T= 8,S. But by 
axiom (2) yS,ST and 8i8 belong to the group ; also 8^81 = ilT^T, and 
8,8= a. Hence 7"= a 

" Cf. loc. rAl. Biv. Mat. vol. ly. 



Hosted by 



Google 



CHAPTER VI. 



INFINITESIMAL ROTATIONS. 



46. An infinitesimal transformation of the projective group (cf. 
§ 40, equations (2)), which leaves the origin and the axis of x latent, is 
of the form 






dy 

de / . , \\ 

We proceed to consider the specialization necessary for the co- 
efficients in order that this may be a 'rotation round the axis of a:' in 
a congruence group. 

There is in a congruence group only one infinitesimal 'rotation' 
round any given line with a given point on the line latent. For consider 
the motion of the plane, }/==■■ pe, round the axis of x with the origin 
latent; after the infinitesimal transformation (1), we have 

dy _ dz ^ 
'dt^^di'^^dt' 

Substituting from (l), and putting y ^pz, we find 

^ = o^;, + (o,j2 - a^,) p - a^p^. 



dp _ 
dt~ 



Hence when p is changed to ^ + <:?^ by the infinitesimal transformation 
(1) we find 

d^t^ ., '^\_ ,. (2). 



o^, + {<x^-o..^)p 



i 



Hosted by 



Google 



50 THE UN1QUENL~)~) <.IF BOrUIONS [CH. VI 

Now consider a second loflnitesmial transformation of similar form 
to (1), only with 0,1, a^', etc as coettiLieiits Let dit be the inere- 
meiit of i requisite to change p into p + dp Then we liavo 

*'-<To?^>-..y (* 

Now consider the transformation 

mth two similar equations ; where {-^) e fro tl e first trans- 
formation, and (-37 1 from the second. Buttl tra sfor ation leaves 

the plane, y -pz, latent. Hence by the pi l " t n of 45, it is the 
identical transformation. Thus we find dv dj d 0, for every 
value of a;, if, s, and^. Thus 

^i£+ o^ + asiZ - a: (aiO! + a^p + Ojs) 

with corresponding equations for y and z. These three equations hold 
for every value of x, y, z, and p. Hence it is easy to prove that 



Thus the infinitesimal transformations are identical. 

47. The plane, my + nz = (i,\s latent for the rotation of g 46 (1), 

if, ™ -^ + M -jT - 0, is satisfied whenever the point (x, y, z) lies on the 

plane. Hence 

moja 4- na.fi = am, 
mii^t + im-fs. = mi, 
and o- is given by 

(<r - a,,) (tr-o.^) -<.,,«,, = (l). 



But by the proposition of § 45, there can be no real latent plane of 
this form. Hence the roots of equation (l) are imaginary. Thus 

4 (nsaOoj -«,=««.) -(o:= + '^x,/>0 (2). 



Hosted by 



Google 



46-48] MONODHOMY 51 

48. Ill the neighbourhood of the origin the rotittioiiH of S 46 (I) 



dz 

it- ")*"■" I 

Thus, writingyx ef', zfx eP*,p satisfies equation (1) of § 47. Heuee 
p is com])lex. llius we may write 

y = eH«jt+°!s)( fj/„ cos vt + q sin vf)] 

2 = gi (-^ + "h) t (z^ cos vt + q sin vt) \ 

where V - J{a^<>-s, — a^o-ii — \ (ojj + aaa)^!, and q and q can be detennined 

in terms oiyt, So,and of the coefficients. Thus, putting A = eK"52"^"s'>"''', 

when t - tt/v, 

y = -\y„ z=-i^z„ (3), 

and when ? = 2t/i', y=^%< s=^% (4). 

By the proposition of § 45, the equations (4) must reduce to 
? = ?iii 3=2o- Hence A = i, and therefore 

■^ + "^ = (5). 

Thus for a value of (, not zero, the integral form of equations (l) yields 
the identical transformation. 
Also equations (! 



y^y„cosvt- 



<^^-^o + 



..(6). 



Hence a value of t can be found such that by the corresponding 
transformation of the type of etiuations (6), any plane yo -Po^^ is trans- 
formed into any plane «/ -pz, the axis of a? being transformed directly, 
and the neighbourhoods of on the planes as divided by the axis of ir 
corresponding in assigned manners. Hence by axiom (3) of § 45, this 
is the only transformation of tlie group for which these conditions are 
fulfilled. 

Henc« the transformations for which the origin and the axi.s of a; 
are latent, the axis of jc being transformed directly in the neighbour- 
hood of the origin, form a one-limbed continuons group produced by 
the infinitesimal transformation which fulfils these conditions. 



Hosted by 



Google 



52 LATENCY OF POINTS ON AXIS [CH. VI 

49. The transfonnation of §46 (I) on the latent axis of x 
(i.e. y = (i, z — Q) is given by 

dx_ _ „ 

dt~ " ' ■ 
If a-a + 0, the solution is 

If Oil = 0, tho solution is 

But ((if § 48) ivhon t^2iTJv, ive find x-x,, for every value of x^. 
Hence a,i = 0, q, = 0. 

Thus every point on any line is latent for a rotation round it with one 
point of it latent. This fundamental theorem will be cited by the 
shortened statement, that ' every point on aii axis of rotation is 
latent.'. 

Thus equations (1) of g 46 for the infinitesimal rotation round tJie 
axis of X, reduce to 

dx / \\ 

^ = a.^/ + ".^-^C".2/ + a,^) 



^^^o.^y + a^Z~y{a.,y + ^Z) V (l), 



dt 



= a..,^y-i-a..^..Z-z{a.,yA-iXiZ)} 



where 
and 



-.(2). 



50. The condition that 

lx + my + nz = 0, (/ + 0) (I), 

should be a latent plane for tlie rotation (1) of g 49 is that 
,dx dy dz ,, 

whenever (1) is satisfied. Hence substituting for 

dx dy ds 

dt ' 'dt ' dt ' 
and using (1), we find 



-(»)■ 



Hosted by 



Google 



49-52] LATENT PLANES 53 

From the inequality (2) of § 49, it follows that the solution of this 
equation satisfies the condition, ^+0. 

Let this plane be taken to be the plane of yz, i.e. the plane x = G. 
Tliis reiiuires 

«..-o, ".. = <> (*). 

51. With this specialization of the plane of yz, tlie condition that, 

Ix + my + nz + l^f) (l), 

should he a latent plane for the rotation (1) of g 49 is that 

,dx dy dz „ 
at dt dt 
whenever (l) is satisfied. Hence substituting fi-om equations (l) of 
S 49 and using equation (1), we find (cf. § 50, equation (4)) 

''32«* + "33«+ "3 = 0/ 

Hence there is a family of latent planes of the form (l), where I is 
the variable parameter, and m and n are definitely determined in terms 
of the coefficients of the infinitesimal rotation. Now let one member 
of this family be taken to be the infinite plane. Then from equations 
(2), we find 

a, = 0, a, = (3). 

Hence with these choices for the plane of ys and for the infinite 
plane, the infinitesimal rotation round the axis of x is reduced to the 
form 

^ = «s3y + a2ajr y (4), 

dz 

where 052+033 =01 ,-•. 

'^!i<hs-°-n°'^>^> 

Then every plane of the family, A^r + /i = 0, is latent. 

52. Any infinitesima] motion, which keeps the origin fixed, is of 
the form 



with two similar equations ) 



-CD- 



Hosted by 



Google 



54 AXES OF ROTATIONS [CH. VI 

If the line, x:-l<T,y~ m<r, z - nrr, is latent, then 

dxjdir dy_ d<r dz _ d^ 
di ~ dt ' dt~ dt ' di dt' 

Henee putting p for - -r- , the equations (l) become 

with two similar equations. 

These equations hold for all values of a-. Accordingly, nuar the 
origin, when cr is very small, 

with two similar equations. 
Hence p, in the neighbourhood of the origin. 



But this equation has always one real root. Thus there is always 
one real latent line through the origin. Hence every infinitesimal 
motion for which one point is latent possesses an 'axis.' Also (of. §49) 
every point on this axis is latent. Accordingly for every point on the 
axis, x = l<T, y- mo; z — no-, we have 





I-. 


i~-o- 


fr-"- 


Henee 


f„ / + %«! + «i3W - <7 {Ui + m(3 + »M,) = 0, 




with two similar equations. 


These equations hold for every 


value of o 


. Tlius 




<„( + 


,3»i + (,,n 


.0 




.„( + 


^m + tasM 


= I 




-of 




.,; + 


aWi + e,n 


= 



Henee we find the equation, 1 1™ | = 0, and that the values of 
I : m : n which satisfy the first three equations, must satisfy the 
fourth. 



Hosted by 



Google 



52, 53] AXES OF ROTATIONS 55 

53. The infinitesimal rotatioQ round the axis of y as axis is of the 
form (cf. § 49, equations (1) and (2)), 



..(2). 



where A, + ^^^ =0| 

Then, since (rf ^ 45, axiom (1)) the motions form a group, by 
combining this mfitiitesima! rotation with that round the axis of x, 
another infinitesimal rotation of the group is found. Thus (cf. g 51, 
equations (4)) an mfinite'.imal rotation of the group, assuming the 
special axes and infinite plane of s? 51, is of the form 

J„ft,»- + .a„<, + (A,+ «a„)2-J/(fta) + As)| (3), 

where k has any arbitrary value. 
Hence (ef. g 52) we have 

I Am 0, fe I 



But equation (4) holds for every value of «. Hence 
Hence (cf. § 51, equations (5)), 



Tlienee, again from etiuation (4), we find 



From equations (2) and (5) we find 

A.-0 ., 



(6). 



Hosted by 



Google 



56 RECTANGULAR AXES [CH. VI 

54. Now (ef. I 50) the plane of yz Is the latent plaue through the 
origin of the infiDitesimal rotation round the axis of x, and the axes of 
y and z are any distinct lines in this plane through the origin. Any 
point on the latent plane, Ix-^-my-^nz-^i, of the rotation round the 
axis of y satisfies (cf. § 53, equations (1), (6), and (7)) 

Hence m^.^ + n^^ = 0, l^y, + m^^, - 0. 

Thus tlie equation of the latent plane is 

But (cf. §53, equations (2)) ^i |ff,i cinnot \anish Hence the 
latent plane cannot contain the axis of ^ Thus we may assume its 
intersection with the plane, « = {if with the latent pliiie of the 
rotation round Ox), to be the axis of z With thi^j assumption we 
have 

A. = (2). 

Then from equation (6) of g 53, we find 

"^ = (3). 

And from equations fS) of | 51, we find 

•..-0 (*)■ 

A latent plane of an infinitesimal rotation round an axis ivill be 
said to be perpendicular to the axis. The set of axes of coordinates 
with any given origin, found by taking the axis of x to be any line, 
the axis of y to be any line in the latent plane through the origin of 
the infinitesimal rotation round the axis of x, and the axis of s to ba 
the line of intersection of the latent planes through the origin of the 
infinitesimal rotations round the axes of x and y, will be said to be 
mutually perpendicular, or mutually at right angles. 

It has now to be proved that a set of axes mutually at right angles 
have reciprocal properties in respect to each other. 

55. With the mutually perpendicular axes of § 54, the equations 
(2) of § 52, as applied to the infinitesimal rotation of equations (3) of 
g 53, become 

Hence « can be given any arbitrary value, and then the corresponding 



Hosted by 



Google 



54-50] THK COMMON LATENT PLANE 57 

values of I : m -.n are to be iouiid. Also fi,-,, P:„, n^., a-^ cannot 
vanish. 

Henee we have n = 0, Ijxa^ = m/(- ^a,). 
Thus ft-0 (1). 

56. Again, let 1'^ + mi/ + 31^+1=0, he any one of the family of 
latent planes of the rotation round the axis of j/. Then for all points 
on the plane, 

.d^ d^ dz 
dt dt dt 
Hence substituting from equations (1) of § 53, remembering that 

Pn. fe. Ai, A 
have all been proved to vanish for the special axes, we have 

for all points on the plane. Also jS,,, ft, do not vanish. Hence 

« = 0, /--(»Bfe + ft)/ft,. 

Thus there is one latent [»laiie for which »j-(), !? = 0, /- — ft/(3ia- 
This is the plane 

But this plane is a member of the family (cf. | 51) of latent planes 
of the rotation round the axis of x. Also the infinite plane ha.^ been 
chosen to he any member of this family. Thus we now choose the 
infinite plane to be the one common member of the two families of 
latent planes of the infinitesimal rotations round the ajces of x and of 
y. ITiis plane, since j8,s=i=0, can never pass through the origin. With 
this choice, we find 

ft-« (>). 

Then, with this special tetrahedron of reference, the equations 
defining the infinitesimal rotation round the axis of iv are reduced to 
dx „ dii dz ,,,. 

^=^' dt-'^^'' jr"-^ t^)' 

where assOjj^o (3). 

Also the equations defining the infinitesimal rotation round the axis 
of y are reduced to 

S^ft- f^''- a^«- w 

where Anfti<U (5). 



Hosted by 



Google 



S8 AXES OP ROTATIONS [CH. VI 

57. The equations defining the infinitesimal rotation round the 
axis of z are (cf. g 53, equations (1), (5) and (7)), 



dx 



yi,ie-y{y,x + y,,y) 
'^.=y^x + y^y-z{y,x + y,y) 



dt 



where 



7..y.i<0 (2). 

Thus the transformation found by combining three infinitesimal 
rotations round the axes of x, of y, and of z is by equations (2) and 
(4) of §56, 



^^- - "-c/i^v + •'■A^ - ■■^ («^<yj^ + "^.r^y) 


£ = «m^ + C-^^, + « A.) e-y («iY,a; + «.y,i/) 


~ = («,^:,, + «37,,0 .T + {K.,y,, + OL^) y - s (K^y.X + « 


ce applying equations (2) of § 52, we find 




, «3y„ , "A 




"SYSI , , a^ + K2^.33 




■<i^^ + "m, "^y-^ + a^.. 



iV^) j 



This equation holds for every value of kj and tj. 

Thus the term involving k^% yields yi;i8~!;83i = 0. Hence, since 
y,i and jSsi cannot vanish, we have 



The term involving k^^ yields 7127^0^, = 0. Hence, : 
cannot vanish, we have 



....(4). 
^ and a 



.(5; 



The coefficient of kjS is yisysi^ss + ftay^ysa- Hence, using (4_1 and (0), 
and noting that yS,^ and y-j, cannot vanish, we find 

y^^-0 (6). 



The coefiieient of kc,k.j gives 

y,.«^A 



Jo^in^y^ = 



..(7). 



Hosted by 



Google 



67, 58] OESERAL FORM FOE INFrSlTESIMAL ROTATIONS 59 

Now equations (2) of § 52, applied to tin's case, become, after 
simplifying by (4), (5) and (6), 

Ka7,2m + K^^n = 0, 
K,y^l + UiaW = 0, 

Ks^jl + osi-m = 0, 

Instil + K^^m - 0. 
Hence a^y^ - njisiys = 0. 

This equation hoWs for all values of kj, and a^^^ and ^^ do not vanish. 

Hence yj = 0, y3 = (8). 

Thus the infinite plane is the common latent plane of the tliree infini- 
tesimal rotations round the three rectangular axes. 

58. Thus using equations (4), (5), (6), (8) of § 57, the eiitiations 
for the infinitesimal rotations round the three mutiutUy perpendicular 
axes, the infinite plane being the common latent plane of the rotatioii.s, 
are 

(Jx ^ Au -ds , , . 



dx 



1% <h 

dt ' it ' 



■m, 



'^1=^'^^- Ir^--^^' dt='' ^-^^^ 

where ».5'»:^<0, AA<0, yi.ysi<0 (4), 

and T,»cu^:n + As<^y^ = (5). 

jt at once follows irom the symmetry of these equations, that a set 
of axes mutually at right angles have reciprocal properties in respect to 
each other. 

The mention of equations (4) and (5) is avoided by altering the 
unit points* on the axes, that is, by writing Aa; for x, ii-y for y, and 
vz for s, where A, ^ v are constants at our disposal. Let them be 
chosen, so that 

/^.la/f = - i^/t ^ <", (say), 
and vPnl^ = - \p^ijv = w; (say). 

By equations (4), tJie ratios ai k -. p. : v are real. Then by equation 
(5), we have 

^ya/^ = - /i-yi./A- = «i3 (say). 
* Cf. Proj. Geoui. §42. 



Hosted by 



Google 



60 GENERAL FORM FOR INFINITESIMAL ROTATIONS [CH. YI 

Hence remembering that oi,, ui^, ai^ are arbitrary parameters, we find 
that any infinitesimal rotation round an axis through the origin can be 
expressed in the form 

da:: dy dz ,„, 

s— »»"* i=-".'+« a— "'^+"'» ■(«)■ 

The latent line of the rotation is given by 

Thus this form gives one and only one infinitesimal rotation round aJiy 
line through the origin. Hence the fonn (6) can include no infini- 
tesimal transformation other than those of the congruence group under 
consideration. 

A t«trahedroii formed by three mutually perpendicular axes, mth 
the common latent plane of the three rotations round the axes for its 
fourth plane, and with the unit points of its axes chosen so aa to produce 
equations (6), will be called a normal reference tetrahedron. 

When the coi^ruence group is given, the normal reference tetra- 
hedrons are determinate, though infinite in number. But a congruence 
group can be found so that any given tetrahedron is a normal reference 
tetrahedron. 



Hosted by 



Google 



CHAPTER VII. 



THE ABSOLUTK. 



59. Consider the surfaces which are latent for a rotation round 
the axis of m. Let the axis system form a normal reference tetrahedron. 
Then the infinitesimal rotation can be written 

dx „ dy dz ,,, 

Let u = be any latent surface. Then we have 



as the requisite condition. Solving this linear equation by I 

rule, and remembering that x has been treated as a constant, we find 

that the latent surfaces are of the form 

/(," + «■, j;).0 (2), 

where/ is an arbitrary function. Surfaces, whose equations are of the 
form of (2), will be called surfaces of revolution round tlie axis of x. 

60. A necessary and sufficient condition, that a surface may be 
latent for any congruence transformation which leaves tlie origin at 
rest, is tliat the surface be a surface of revolution round each of the 
three axes. Hence by equation (2) of § 59 this family of surfaces is 
represented by 

A(^ + / + 3=) + ^ = (1), 

where A and ^ are arbitrary parameters. Let these be called spheres, 
with the origin as centre. 

The infinite plane is the common polar plane of the origin, with 
respect to each of the spheres with it as centre. Thus transforming to 



Hosted by 



Google 



6i SPBEKES [CH. VH 

homogeneous coordinates by putting x = Ji^iU', y=^YlU, z^ZjU, 
where, U=0, is the equation of the infinite plaue, the equation of 
the family of couccutric spheres is 

k{X-'+ r^ + ^) + /j,t^=0 (2). 

Thus returning to the original coordinates, if (a;, y, z) - 0, is the 
equation of any sphere, centre at {x„, y,„ sj, the equation of the family 
of spheres with that centre is 

x*(..,..)..(..g.,.|..S/i)^o m. 

where, as usual, t is introduced to make the equation homogeneous 
and is put equal to 1 after differentiation. 

61. By recurring to equation (2) of § 60, we see that the plane 
of yx, which is the plane perpendicular to the axis of a;, is the plane 
through the origin and through the common conjugate line of the axis 
of CO with respect to any of the spheres, centre the origin. Hence if, 
^ (a,', y, a) = 0, is any sphere with centre A^ {x^, y^, z^, and A, is the 
point {x^, y,, z,), then the plane through A^ perpendicular to A^A^ is 

C,..A..)g.(j,. + »„)'|+(„A..)|.(l.»)|.0 ...(1), 
where 

and i/>o, (3)1 6tc. are the results of substituting the coordinates of 

Ao in <l> (x, y, s), t~ , etc. 

Let the left-liand side of (l) be written (A^, Ai, P)^, where P is 
the variable point {x, y, z). Thus the equation of the plane, perpen- 
dicular to the line AoA, and through the point ^0, is 

{A„A„P)i = (2). 

A quadratic surface of revolution round the axis of j» is of the form 
(cf. equation (2) of § 59) 

b(f + ^) + a:>^ + 2gx + c = (.^ 

This can he written in the form 

X {a (a^ +/ + £■') + ^} + a's:^ + 2gx + c'^0. 
Thus, \i'p{x,y, s) = () is the equation of a sphere, centre d, (xo,yo,^u). 



Hosted by 



Google 



60-62] FAMIHES OF CONCENTRIC SPHEREH 63 

the eijuation of a ^uadric biirfiice of revolution round the line joining 
At to Ai (xi, yi , Si) is 






^ dj> djji- 



"i}-« c* 



The family of quadric surfaces of revolution round any line must 
include every family of concentric spheres with its common c«ntre at a 
point on the line. Accordingly taking ^o to be the origin, and <j> (w, y, z) 
to be ar' + y + a=+l, the family of spheres at any point {Wi, y,, a,) is 
included in the family 

X(a? + i/' + x;* + l) + ^ {a!,x + yiy + z,zf + 'iv (x,x + y,y + s,s) + p = 0, 
that is, in the family 

X(a^ + ^ + s?) + IJ.(s!,a: + y,i/ + z,zf + 2y(a:iX+2/,y + z,z) + cr = ...(5). 
For this is the family of quadrics of revolution round the line joining 
the origin to the point (x^, y,, z,). 

62, Consider any two infinitesimal projective transformations in 



the plane 


of 431. 


One transformation is defined by 








1,^; + (h^y + ay, - 


-x(a,a; + a,y) 






f = * 


1^ + a^y + «ai ■ 


-y{a^x^a.,y) 


The other is defined by 










S-. 


,x + b,iy + bu - 


-^(M + &,j)| 






I-- 


aX + h^ + bta- 


-y{h,x + b.,y)^ 



..(2). 



Now each of these transformations leaves a family of curves latent, 
the locus of points, which either are the points of contact of members 
of the respective famiKes, or are points on a curve common to the two 
families, is given by 

anX + a^y + dia - a; {a-tX + (i^y) ^ a^jX + a^y ^-a-g-y («i^ + a^y) ,„. 
baW-i-hyiy+bi!,-a;{biX-i-b.iy') biiX + h^y-i-b«3-y{biX + biy) ^' '' 
Tliis locus is a cubic curve. 

Now consider two rotations belonging to the congruence group 
under consideration. Let one be about the point (0, 0, 0), and the 



Hosted by 



Google 



64 THE ABSOLUTE SPHERE [CH. V!I 

other about the point (a;^, y^, 0), and let the plane of xy be latent for 
them both. Then for the first rotation, the family of latent curves 
(of. g 60, equation (1)) in the plane of xy is given by 

A(a^U/)+/i = (4); 

and for the second rotation, the family of latent curves (ef. § 61, 
equation (5)) in the plane of xy is included in the family 

A, {£' + /) + /., {xix H- y^yy + 2n {x^x + i/iy) + T,^0 (5). 

It is easy to prove tliat the locus of points where members of the 
family (4) touch members of the family (5) is the line, x/xi^y/y^. 

Hence for the case of these two rotations the cubic curve of equation 
(3) above becomes a straight line and a common member of the two 
families (4) and (5). Thus these two families must possess a common 
member. Let it be 

Then (cf. g60, equation (1), and g 61, equation (5)) the sphere, 

c,(_x' + f + ^) + l^O (6), 

belongs to the family of spheres centre (0, 0, 0), aiid also to the family 
of spheres centre {x,, y„ 0). 

Hence any two distinct families of concentric spheres with different 
centres possess one member in common. 

63. Let (xu 2/1, Si) and (^j, y.., Zi) be any two points which are 
not eoUinear witli the point (0, 0, 0), Let (of, § 62) 

Ci(i^ + y + 3')+l-0 (1) 

be the sphere common to the two families of spheres with centres at 
(O, 0, 0) and {x^, y^, zi) respectively ; and let 

e,{x- + f+z^) + l=0 (2) 

be tlie sphere common to the two famihes of spheres with centres at 
(0, 0, 0) and {x^, y^, z^ respectively. Then (cf. g 60, equation (3)) the 
family of spheres, centre {x,, y„ Zi), is given by 

\,{c(^ + f + £?•)+ l\ + l^r{Ci(XrX+y,y + S,Z) + l\' = 0.-.(3\ 
and the family of spheres, centre (xs, y^, 2a), is given by 

But (cf. § 62) it is possible to find a common member of the families 
(3) and (4). Then remembering that the two centres are not collinear 
with the origin, it is easy to prove that we must have 

A'i^O, ^. = 0, c,^c, (5), 



Hosted by 



Google 



i2-65] 



THE ABSOLUTE 



65 



Thus the three families of concentric spheres witli centres at three 
non-eollinear points have one member in common. Hence it is easy to 
prove that there is one sphere common to all families of concentric 
spheres. Let this sphere be called ' The Absolute.' 

64. By a rotation round a suitable axis any point can be moved 
to any neighbouring position. For, if 

c(^ + / + 2?)+l-0 (1) 

is the absolute, then (cf. § 63, equation (3)) 

c{a? + f + z') + l-{c,{x,x + y,yi-z,z)+\f^Q (2) 

ia the equation of the sphere, centre (x,, yn z^, touching at the origin 
the plane 

Hence if Xijl = y,jm = Sijn, the sphere touches at the origin the plane 



foH 



my + 



Now let this be any plane through the origin and through the neigh- 
bouring position to which the origin is to be displaced. Then it 
follows that a rotation round a suitable axis through the point (jci,yi,2i) 
can effect the required displacement of the origin. 

Thus the effect of any infinitesimal congruent transformation can 
be produced by combining a rotation round some line not passing 
through the origin with a rotation round some line through the origin. 
Hence (cf, § 45, axiom (3)) the absolute i,s latent for any congruent 
transformation of the group. 

65. Conversely the group of projective transformations, for which 
a given imaginary or convex quadric is latent, forms a congruence group. 
For take a tetrahedron, self-polar with respect to the given surface of 
the second degree, as the fundamental tetrahedron, Then the equation 
of the surface can be reduced to the form 

c{x' + f--r^)^l=Q (1), 

and, when c = 0, the surface degenerates into the infinite plane. 

The most general form of infinitesimal projective transformation is 
dx _ 
di" 



dt 
dz _ 
di~ 



f a^^y + a,^~x (a,X + a^y + a^) 
¥a.^y+a^-y (a,x + a^y + a^z) 



+ a^X + a^^y + <h^ - Z (>i,x + rhy + a^z) 



..(2). 



Hosted by 



Google 



66 THE ABSOLUTE [CH. VII 

This is to satisfy 

-^ + J/f*»S = (B), 



when (1) is satisfied. 

Hence (3) becomes, after simplifying by (l), 

CX(U + thi^ + ai^ + Oiae) + CT/ (« + a.,,3; + a^ + a^) 

+ cz(w + a-^,ir + a:,,y + a^) 4- (a,(t! + a^p+a^)^0 (4). 

Then (4) must either he identical with (l), or must be an identity. 
But it cannot he identical with (l). Hence it is an identity. 

Thus CM + o, =0, CV + a^-O, C>C + a3 = 0, 



(5). 



But when the origin is fixed, these equations reduce to the equations 
(6) of § 58 for the general infinitesimal rotation round the origin of the 
corresponding congruence group. Also it is easy to see that the 
above equations give one and only one infinitesimal transformation 
which transports the origin to a given neighbouring point (udt, vdf, 
wdi), and at the same time transforms a given line I through the 
origin, and a given plane ^ through I, into a neighbouring line and 
plane respectively through the new position of the origin and the new 
position of I. Thus by g 64 and by axiom (3) of § 45 all the transforma- 
tions of the form (5) belong to the associated congruence group. 

Hence these equations give the general form of an infinitesimal 
congruence transformation, referred to a normal reference tetrahedron. 
The equation of the absolute is then 

c{a^ + f + z')+1^0 (6). 

It follows from equations (5) by applying tiie ' Second Fundamental 
Theorem ' (cf. g 36) that a congruence group is a six-limhed finite 
continuous group. 



ea„ = 0, cnjs = 0, cas, 


-0, 


C(a,. + n^) = 0, C(a,, + a,:) = 0, C (a^ + a,,) 


= 0. 


Thus the general form of transformation is 








— = 1! — to,z + lo^a: 4- ml (ii.r + iw/ + wjs"! 




, " "'I* ' "'a*" ^ ^u ^«*t ^ vif T it,vj 




iz 





Hosted by 



Google 



65-67] TYPES OF COSGBOENCE GROUPS 67 

66. The congrnenoe groups are divisible into three types. 

In Type I, c is positive. Tlien the absolute (cf. § 65, equation 
(6)) is an imaginary quadric. The congruence axioms hold for the 
transformation of all points of the projective space by any members 
of such a congruence group. Such a congruence group is called 
Elliptic. 

In Type II, e is negative. Then the absolute is a real convex 
quadric. The congruence axioms only hold for all points within the 
space enclosed by the absolute for transformations by any members 
of the corresponding congruence group. Such a congruence group is 
called Hyperbolic. 

In Type III, the numerical value of c has diminished indefinitely. 
Groups of this type require further investigation. They are called 
Parabolic. 

67. In the Parabolic case, when c diminishes indefinitely, the point 
equation of the absolute 

reduces to that of the infinite plane. Hence for every parabolic group 
a plane is latent. 

Again in equation (3) of g 63 by putting Ac = «, /i = i - X, we find 
that the equation of any sphere, centre (iBi, ^i, sj, can be written 
a{^ + y' + !^- 2«ia^ - '^yty - SSi^) + & + c {{he - a) {x^a: + p^ + z^zf 
+ 2h {XiX + y^ + z,z)] = 0. 
Hence when c dimimshes indefinitely, and the coefficient of no t«rm 
is infinite, the general equation for spheres, centre («!, i/„ z,), becomes 

a(a^ + f + ^-2x,x-2y,y-2siz) + b^0 (1). 

Hence every sphere cuts the infinite plane, which is latent for this 
special choice of coordinates, in the imaginary conic where 

a^ + P^ + s^^O, 
cuts it. Thus this imaginary conic in the infinite plane is also 
latent. 

Accordingly in the parabolic form the absolute is represented by 
the latent infinite plane, and by the imaginary latent conic in the 
infinite plane, A set of concurrent rectangular axes are a set of 
concurrent lines intersecting the infinite plane at the angular points 
of a triangle self-conjugate with regard to the absolute conic. 



Hosted by 



Google 



68 I'ARABOLic Groups [ch. vii 

The general form of the iofinitesima! transformation (cf. § G5, 
equations (5)), referred to a normal reference tetrahedron, reduces to 



di ~ 



Hosted by 



Google 



CHAPTER VIII. 



METRICAL GEOMETRY. 



68. The theory of distauce foUowa immediately from that of con- 
gruence hy noting two facts. In the first place let the anhannouic 
ratio* of the range {FQRS} he denoted by [PQRS] ; then if 

^,, A,, P„ F„ P, 
are collinear points, we have 

{A,P,A,F~] X {AJ\A,P,} - {A,P,A,P,}, 
or, in another fonn, 

log{A,F,A,P,} + \Qg{A,P^J',] = hg{A,P,A,P,} (I). 

In the second place, let Ai and Ai be the two real or imaginary 
points in which the line containing the points P,, P., P-^ meets the 
real or imaginary absolute of some definite congruence group. Then 
for any transformation of that group (a) the anhamionie ratios are 
unaltered because the transformation is projective, and (yS) the points 
A-i and jiaare transformed into the points in which the transformed 
position of the line P1P3P3 cuts the absolute. 

Thus if some multiple t of log {AiPjA^Pj} be defined as the 
distance between the points P, and Pa, where Ai and A^ are the 
points where the line PiPaCuts the absolute, then equation (1) secures 
the characteristic addition property of distance in respect to collineai 
points, and the second consideration secures the characteristic in- 
variability of distances in a congruence transformation. 

* Of. Proj. Geom, §38. 

+ Thia definition ia due to Cayley, Sixth Memoir on Quantics, Phil, Trans. 
1859 and Coll. Papers, vol. ii., and to Klein, Ueber die eogc/iaimle nicht-eukUdisahe 
Oemnetrie, Matli. Ann. vol. it. 1871. 



Hosted by 



Google 



70 ANALYTICAL EXPRESSION FOR DISTANCE [CH. VHI 

69. Now let A be tiie point (a:,, y., z,), and A tlie point 
(jJ^i yii z,). Then the coordinates of any point on the line P1P2 take 
thefomi 

Ajc, + /la^.j A^i + jjj/^ A^j + nz^ 

A 4- ^ A -r jTX A + ^ 

Thus the points ^, and -4,, where the line PjP^ cuts the absolute, 

are given by the roots Aj//^ and A^Z/ij of the q^uadratic equation 
A= {c (x,^ + y{' + i,=) + 1 } + 2A;,t {c (a;,a-, + y^^ + z,s,) + 1 } 

+ /*McC^='+y.' + 2=0 + il = o (!)■ 

For the elliptic case, when c ie positive, put 

cose= c(w,x._^v,y. + z,z.)^l 

M^i" + 2/1' + %") + 1 !* {C (i^s' + 3/s' + s^,') + 1 } - 
Then* {A ,P,AJ\\ = ^A^/A,^ = e2.«. 

Thus the distance PiP;, written dist {P-iPi), can be deiined by 

A\%tiP,P:) = ^hg{A,P,A.,r.'i (2). 

Hence 
dist_r/Vy ^ ^^ flfj;i;r3 + .yiya + Sia„)+ 1 . , 

It is evident that there will be two distances, associated with the two 
segments into which the point-pair Pi and P^ divides the line PiP^. 
If one distance, say the smaller, is called dist (PiPi), the other will 
be 117 -dist {Pi Pa)- Thus the whole length of a straight line is jry. 
This system of metrical geometry embraces the whole of Projective 
Space t. 

70. For the hj'jierholic case, when c is negative, put 
coshe= 1^^(W.^/,?A. + .,^.) 

- Cf. Proj.Geom. §38. 

+ Tlie pOBsibilitj of a Metrical Geometry with closed liuea of finite length was 
first suggested by Kiemann, of. loc. cit. For a full account and ampliEoation of 
BieiQBnn'a treatment of distanoe, cf. Forme of Noa-BuclideanSpaee, hyF.S.WoodtS, 
printed in Ths Boston CoUoqmnm, New York. 1905. 



Hosted by 



Google 



69-72] ANALYTICAL EXPRESSION FOR DISTANCE 71 

Then if Fi and P-^ are both within the region enclosed hy the ahsolnte, 
is necessarily real. 

Hence (cf. g 69, equation (1)) 

Thus the distance P1P2, written dist{PiPs), can he defined hy 

dht(P,P,)^iyhg{A^PiA,P,} (1). 

Therefore 

^^dist(P^) _ ___ i..r.,..H-,,..,.^..) 

n 11 ly b n d ta betw n P an I P Th m t b 

at 1 nth tl e ol egn e t f tl e line -P P h h 1 e. h lly 

w tl n tl e^ n n lo ed by tl ab ol te Tl y t f metn al 

ge met y nly b a tl p t wb h 1 w th n the eg 

1 d b> t! ab 1 te A j i nt n ti n t la 1 tb 

11 t ! if t ajil t h t 1 t i It 

the I 1 t 

71. The parabolic formula for the distance, arising when c is in- 
definitely diminished, can be derived as a limit from either of the other 
two cases. Put v% = ±l, according &S c is positive or negative, so 
that y increases as e diminishes numerically. Then expanding both 
sides of equation (3) of § S9, or of equation (2) of § 70, and pro- 
ceeding to the limit, we find 

{d»t(P.i>,)|- = (i.-»,)- + G,,-,,)- + fe-^,)' (1). 

The pamboHc system of metrical geometry embraces all projective 
space with the exception of points on the latent plane, which is the 
infinite plane in our system of coordinates. This is the ordinary 
EucHdeau Geometry. 

72. Exactly the same procedure can be applied for the measure- 
ment of the angle between planes. Let pi and p^ be any two planes, 
and let d and (2 be the two real or imaginary planes through the 
intersection of p^ and p-i and tangential to the absolute. When the 

■ Metrical Geometry of this Hyperbolic Type was first discovered by Lobat- 
Bohefskij in 1826, and independeatly by J. Eolyai in 1832. This discovery 13 
the origin of the modern period of thought in respect to the foundations of 
Geometry. 



Hosted by 



Google 



72 ANGLES [CH. VJII 

congruence group is elliptic, or when the congruence group is hyper- 
bolic, and the line of intersection of p, and p^ passes through the 
region enclosed by the absolute, then t, and ti are necessarily not real. 

Then the angle between the planes is defined to be :^\og{tipApi\. 
'fhns if the two planes are given by 

IjX + m,y + tiiZ + pi ^ 0, Ij: + m.,y + n£+p.! = Q, 
and 6 is the angle between them, we have 

, 1,1^ + m,mi + n,n^ + cptp.. 



{li' + m^ + ni' + cpi']^ [li + m^ + Ha' + cp?\ 



..(1). 



As before, there are two angles and ir-B ; but it can be proved that 
the whole angle round a line is 27r, owing to the existence of dia- 
metrically opposite regions in the neiglibourhood of the line. 

In the parabolic case, when c is indefinitely diminished, the angle 
between the planes is given by 



_ liL + !Ki?«j + ni«3 



.(2). 



73. The same procedure can also be applied for the measurement 
of the angle between two concurrent lines. Let ^i and l^ be any two 
concurrent lines in a plane p. Let (, and tz be the real or imaginary 
tangents from the point (^ . l.) to the conic which is the section of the 
absolute by the plane/'. When the congruence group is elliptic, or when 
the congruence group ia hyperbolic and the point (^i . l^ lies within the 
region enclosed by the absolute, then ^i and t^ are necessarily imaginary. 

Then the angle between the lines is defined to be - log |^i^*/;}. Thus 
there are two angles 6 and tt - ^ between two intersecting lines, and 
the whole angle round a point is 2t. 

In the degenerate parabolic case the section of the absolute by the 
plane p becomeis two conjugate imaginary points in tlie plane at 
infinity. These are known as the circular points at infinity. Then 
(i and ij are the imaginary lines from the point {l^ . Q to these points 
respectively*. 

* This projectiTe view of Euclidean Metrical Geometry was elaborated by 
Lagnerre in 1853, previously to the rise of the general theory which is explained 



Hosted by 



Google 



Cambridge Tracts in Mathematics 
and Mathematical Physics 



No, 1. VOLUME AND SURFACE INTEGRALS USED IN 
PHYSICS, by J. G. Leathem, M.A. 2s. 6d. net. 

No. 2. THE INTEGRATION OF FUNCTIONS OF A SINGLE 
VARIABLE, by G. H. Hardy, M.A, 2s. ^d. net. 

No. 3. QUADRATIC FORMS AND THEIR CLASSIFICATION 
EY MEANS OF INVARIANT FACTORS, by 
T. J. I'A. Bromwich, M.A., F.R.S. 3^: dd. net. 

No. 4- THE AXIOMS OF PROJECTIVE GEOMETRY, by 
A. N. Whitehead, ScD., F.R.S. ^s. i>d. net. 

No. 5. THE AXIOMS OF DESCRIPTIVE GEOMETRY, by 
A. N. Whitehead, ScD., F.R.S. 2s. 6d. net. 



In preparation. 



THE DEFINITE INTEGRAL, ITS MEANING AND 
FUNDAMENTAL PROPERTIES, by E. W. Hobson, 
ScD., F.R.S. 

SINGULAR POINTS AND ASYMPTOTES OF PLANE 
CURVES, by Miss C. A. Scott. 

THEEIKONALAND ITS APPLICATION TO OPTICAL 
INSTRUMENTS, by E. T. Whittakler, M.A., F.R.S. 

THE FUNDAMENTAL THEOREMS OF THE DIF- 
FERENTIAL CALCULUS, by W. H. Young, ScD. 

THE CIRCLE AT INFINITY, by J. H. Gu.\ce, M.A. 



Hosted by 



Google 



